Do you suppose they'd let us play ourselves???
The plane is made of carbon fiber with a carbon fiber pusher prop (in back) and a canard design, meaning the big wing is in back, the short wing in front. The GT4 uses an array of 236 off-the-shelf lithium-polymer batteries weighing 900 pounds. The company says the battery pack and 600 hp (peak) electric motor weigh less than the internal combustion engine on a comparable plane, which allowed engineers to add in extra batteries for physical balancing of the plane. There’s also a 23-gallon gas tank. The gas engine kicks in when battery power falls to 25%.
So, my weekend did end on a good note and my son is doing better today. Motrin wore off almost 3 hours ago and he's still nice and cool! Fingers crossed!
Aspen:
I suddenly understood. It was a rookie mistake. I mean a common procrastinator might assume that taxes, which are normally due on the 15th, would be due on Monday the 16th when the 15th falls on a Sunday. But thanks to Abraham Lincoln, Washington D.C. now celebrates Emancipation Day on April 16th. It was April 16, 1862 that Abraham Lincoln, who was the president of the United States at the time, signed the Compensated Emancipation Act, which freed more than 3000 slaves in the District of Columbia. This is the reason that if the 15th falls on a Sunday, we now have a generous TWO extra days to complete the task! A professional procrastinator understands that. And if it means shorter lines at the Post Office, it's a habit I probably won't be changing soon!
Before I leave you today, I want to remind you that CropStop is having an extra challenge this month in March being the National Craft Month!!! If you create a shape card in honor of this celebration….click HERE for more details.
build roads. When they had served their sentence – or most of their sentence –
It's time to put the convertible away for the winter, anyway, and now I can go back with the Honda. To my felons, my rednecks, my People of Walmart. I'm going to buy scads of aerosol cans and stacks of Styrofoam and stuff everything into mountains of non-biodegradable plastic Walmart bags.
Then it was my turn. I handed out a Fitness Cheat Sheet I’d created, a nice handout for the ladies to take home for reference. I was emotional when I first started, because I told them about my own journey when it came to being healthy, and how running was such a passion for me. I shared with them how close I feel to God when running. I spoke about the need for each of them to find their own passion, what will help to keep them healthy. A few said they also run. Others said they hated running, but did gym classes. Still others preferred the elliptical machine, or the treadmill, and I enforced the fact that it doesn’t matter WHAT you do, it’s that you DO IT.
But wait! I forgot to mention: I did mention it in my previous post, the multitude of entrepreneurial ideas I’d like to pursue. I am stuck between the two paths, university or owning a business. I’m honestly 99% sure I would do the best on the university track because, well, that’s just who I am. I really am not good with business related-topics; I’ve tried taking business courses, but I fail at them miserably. I just simply do not understand business, no matter how much I want to. Maybe I should take this as a clear sign towards my true path in life? I think it’s obvious – I just love denying it.
“You work hard. Many hard. Many hard. But… you… don’t… you know… necessary… get what… what… “
I’ve been on 3 cruises, all to the Bahamas. Other than that, I enjoy taking my family to the East coast and having them experience the fun things I did there when I was young. Chincoteague Island brings back great memories. I’m hoping to go with my husband to Hawaii for our 20th anniversary in 2 years!
And, of course, the art galleries and museums (too many to see in our short stay). Naturally we visited the Georgia O’Keeffe Museum, where the collection of roughly 1100 paintings is rotated a few times a year — with only around 50 on display at any one time. O’Keeffe (more about her in a separate post) is most famous for her giant canvases of flowers, incredibly sensuous with their colourful swirls, folded lines and gentle curves. Sometimes her subject is cropped so tight — the tiny centre of a bud unfurling on a massive canvas — that you lose yourself in the pureness of its graphic lines. Then there are her sweeping abstract paintings of undulating waves of colour, and, after living in the deserts of New Mexico, the exquisite painstaking detail of bleached animal skulls she picked up there, often juxtaposed with a single flower.
(Sorry in advance Pat! I know, 'Language Timothy'!) :¬)
There are four main parts of the burrito bowl: the rice, the beans, the meat, & the pico de gallo. Cook each one separately and then layer them in a bowl (or on a plate) and serve with chips or just eat with a fork!
These themes are throughout the film. Most samurai we encounter are either in financial straits or in service to a system they acknowledge as flawed.
Now i just need to find some magnetic sheets so i can turn them into fridge magnets to hold letters/memos etc!
during another birth
Preheat oven to 325 degrees F.
The general prediction is that the COP-17 conference in Durban will not produce any binding agreement on reducing carbon dioxide emissions. Let’s hope this is true.
As I said before, this is not abdicating responsibility, it is the exact opposite. It requires rigorous assessment of your belief system – for you can only get to this place if you believe and trust in a form of unconditional love. My analogy is that if you fall asleep, you trust your body to carry you through the night, your lungs to breathe and your heart to beat. With this process, you trust in a non physical force (that in my personal opinion is as much part of you as your heart or lungs) to hold the crap, essentially. You just have to be willing to surrender it – because your ego won’t be so keen on the idea, the ego wants us to struggle…
So far, on this blog, I’ve avoided cookies. I have some good excuses—no children at home anymore and, well, fear of the Cookie Monster.
So, Urban Outfitters has this brainstorm to sell a new tee with a six-pointed star very similar to the patches the Jews were forced to wear in the Holocaust (yes, Mel, there was in fact a Holocaust). And not only is this piece of drek tee being sold, but it’s also being sold at a $100 price tag. Have we gone off our rockers?
The study concludes:
YOUR HANDS
Imelda May: Rollin' And Tumblin'
Tilly
With political interference and the hand of President Jacob Zuma clear in the appointment of Phil Molefe as Mr Zikalala’s replacement, Judge Claassen’s remarks are yet another reminder of how easily the SABC can be used as a political weapon by the government of the day.
O Lord, who could stand?
When people attribute someone’s untimely death to a Coke overdose, they’re usually not talking about the world’s most popular soda.
HAR MAR SUPERSTAR – GANGSTERS WANT TO CUDDLE ME
they made a race track
One of my favorite ways to work with any Divine Being (especially Goddesses and Angels) is to write Him or Her a letter. For example, let us say that you want to work with Archangel Gabriel to empower your writing, you could write a letter such as this one:
Notes: These are single reps and DO NOT have to be touch and go. One rep would be 1 Power Snatch AND 1 Snatch.
September is a weird place. We’re having now a taste of a summer that has never happened this year and it feels like something that you really should have done in your youth and you’re doing in your middle age as a sort of compensation. In the garden, the tomatoes are still green, the one-and-only green pepper that I had now lies on the ground, nibbled by squirrels, and the grass is covered with red and yellow maple leaves.
Here are few pics I snapped of Beckham today...with a real camera....not my iPhone. Poor child is going to have most of his childhood chronicled with a phone camera:) Thank goodness for technology that's always handy!
"Brother," Edouard spoke. "Where am I? What has happened here?"
Children need supervision and structure, it’s true, but those summers at my father’s home were happy times for me. I was not bored. I was happy, barefoot and free. Those times shaped me into a strong and opinionated woman who makes decisions easily and is not afraid to lead. I loved seeing that little girl in the department store. I wanted to whisper in her ear, “go barefoot whenever possible,” but I just smiled and winked as I walked by.
Hilary Mantel is a breathtaking, witty and sophisticated writer. I loved reading about the distribution of power, intrigue and manipulation at the British royal court in the 1620s. King Henry VIII is in need for a male heir, that's why he wants to get a divorce from Queen Katherine, but the pope wouldn't let him have one. So Henry needs to become not only head of state but head of church in Britain to marry Anne Boleyn. The man helping him to get what he wants is Thomas Cromwell, an eloquent and persuasive man, who does not only represent the King's interests but his own, too. Though Cromwell is a manipulator I got the impression of him as an amiable character. Being the son of a blacksmith, he worked his way up to court, gaining more and more influence, enemies and friends.
14) PetSmart
I did so much--and everything was a joy. A major part of my Saturday was cleaning out and reorganizing the hall closet and upstairs bathroom into a photography printing room for the summer and fall. Both spaces are extra large. The linen closet would easily serve as a tiny walk-in closet, and the bathroom is the size of some Parisian studio apartments.
The story is free. Should it move you, let that movement flow into some concrete action. Every one of us can do something to make a positive difference.
Pogonia comes from the Greek pogon for "beard" and refers to his beard-like labellum (Figure 1), and ophioglossoides may highlight the similarities in the orchid’s leaves to that of the fern Ophioglossum (Figure 2). In the months of June through August, this orchid produces one to three flowers per plant. Mostly bees pollinate the rose pogonia, although it provides no nectar.
generously gave the DT a few images to work with
39And he took it, with its king and all its towns: and he put them to the sword, giving every person in it to the curse; all were put to death: as he had done to Hebron, so he did to Debir and its king.
Happy Polishing!
I've been feeling at sixes and sevens lately. Being between houses is really disconcerting - something like waiting for a bus that won't be coming for hours. You can't leave the bus-stop because you know it will eventually come, but it's confining in the shelter and your vision is limited. You're also preoccupied with all the things you have to do once you get on that bus. Such is my life at the moment.
Kaisercraft Fozz Felt.
AH:No, I don't base any of my characters on people I know. Occasionally I'll use a situation I might have been in with a friend, but never that actual friend.
I have been thinking a lot about sticking to personal boundaries and protecting my ideal work/life balance...
They come to see this and this
Over the traffic of cities—over the rumble of wheels in the streets;
Which children pluck, and, full of pride, uphold,
I stamped the Hero Arts Lattice background stamp in Versamark, then intended to emboss it with white EP, but in the end I opted for clear. I just wanted it to be "not plain", and I think I accomplished that.
I decided to make some cute and simple little napkin rings using the Create a Critter and Paperdoll Dress Up cartridges. I used my IMAGINE and the Imagine More cartridge to fill in all the layers....AWESOME!!! I am in love with my new machine!!! Its so easy to click on what colors you want each layer to be and put one piece of white cardstock on the mat and BAM...the Imagine does all the work =)
Lie to her. If she understands syntax, she will understand your need to lie. Behind words are other things: motivation, value, nuance, dialogue. It will not be the end of the world.
If you're standing next to the mash tun looking out, this is your view. That's Mount Hood, for those outside Oregon.
“I were a bit apprehensive at first and thought Oh, I hope she’s not put nowt dodgy in it, but she’s a lovely lass and she’s from Texas. I said to her At least it’s not the Texas Chainsaw Massacre and I got on great with her and she might be coming to see the show tonight.”
Margilla Hills, the serenity, magnificent buildings and cordial interaction with security forces: Welcome to the Pakistan Secretariat, Islamabad. I love this place.
26 March 2012 Forum with Michael Krasney
My Review: This Book is incredible. I am not being dramatic. It is amazing. It takes place in the not so distant future. It never tells you the actual year of course. That is up to you and your imagination! This book is hard to put down, let me tell you that right now.
7.) The Local Government Unit has decided that the perfect community project would be a pap smear campaign.
I used the Sweet Treats Cartridge for this one. The cupcake is cut out at 5", and I used the card feature then cut out all the layers. I have a confession: I cut out one of the layers for another cupcake on this cartridge, but everything worked out and I think it came out cute. The patterned, embossed paper for the base of the cupcake is from DCWV Sweet Treats. The cupcake "wrapper" is from Me and My Big Ideas. I used plain pink cardstock for the heart, which i just "sponged" on some ink, distressed the edges, and randomly stamped on a pair of circles.
Spring has sprung in CLE-Town! Which means that it’s raining a whole bunch and the temperature can’t decide if its first number should be a 4 or a 7; wheat beer can be found in every fridge and 5K’s are in full swing. We’ve fought through a mild winter, a strange early spring and now it’s finally time to look forward to warm evenings by the grill and long nights on the porch. While I have other times of year that I may prefer, there’s no denying the excitement that summer brings. It’s been a few weeks since we made a list so I think it’s time for the return of “The Most Optimistic Man in America” (Thanks, Max)
1. Use Nye’s anaphoric structure – the ________is famous to the _________ – to generate your own list.
My first Fifi - Trip to the Park and I LOVE her! She's fab to colour and looks so cute, especially with her dinky doggies and cool bag. And is even more fun as she was part of my prize from the Sugar Bowl:0)
a very special lady
Reviewed by Lorie
I seems against all reason SUVs should compete with more versatile MPVs when it comes to cars suiting lifestyles. However Crossovers have improved SUV versatility. The interest in Crossovers, SUVs and 4x4s seems to be a combination of being an alternative to the ubiquitous hatchback, with near MPV versatility and 4×4 macho styling.
Featuring limited edition prints of Paris, Ella Coquine has come up with a clever idea that's sure to please any Francophile. Take a look - Quelle Coquine!
The picture below is shot from the street to the back of the wine house. The pool and reception area is in front of the house on the Skaha lake side.
It was the first major battle of the Revolution, and it was to be the biggest in terms of the number of soldiers on the field. But all flanking maneuvers aside, what has always sparked this reporter’s imagination were the eye-witness bystanders, such as a certain tavern owner who was forced to guide British soldiers through the rugged hills of Brooklyn.
It doesn’t take much these days for me to close my eyes and put my hand on my chest and shudder. It’s an instant rush of nausea, a clenching of my heart, a lightening fast journey my brain travels between an external event and the internal implications of its possibility in my own life.
On our
It is very easy. I got the spice from Jen, but if you live in Leeds you could get it from one of the African shops in the market. I almost bought some dried smoked shrimps today – any ideas for them?
Again, the kitchen is the place to invest, and one of the easiest way to make your kitchen "pop" and set it apart from other kitchens is with a new backsplash. Your kitchen can go from outdated to modern in a day, and there's a variety of options to choose from including...
caffeinated drink that i cannot pronounce
Y'all might remember the grand entrance of the Vook in 2009. If not, in short: it's a form of enhanced e-book with movies and other media built into it. Video + book = Vook. Simple, cool, innovative, no?
I highly suggest you run out today (if there aren't any floods in your area) and grab the stuff to make this tonight. Looking at these pictures and thinking of this soup, I may have to brave the floods and do the same! Mmmmmm....soup....
U.S. public ranked among the world’s most enthusiastic supporters of international law (falling just behind the Germans and the Chinese in global surveys), it now appears that vast majorities of Americans reject the applicability of international law when it comes to the actions of the U.S. government in the “global war on terror.”
So let me help you think about November with this piece of news, coming on board to Beersgivng, we welcome: Avery, Anderson Valley, Bells, Flying Dog, Hebrew, Left Hand, Smuttynose, Southern Tier and Yards.
Sookie Stackhouse Book 11
5. Police firing tear gas and water cannons into Tung Shin Hospital
There may be more, but I found 8 Reasons that Jesus meant John 6 literally.
The PM has made a mockery of reforms and made a hash of democracy. Perhaps we should be thankful that statues are banned in Malaysia, otherwise Najib’s and the self-styled First Lady’s faces would be staring at us from every street corner. – Mkini
Playground in my mind…Clint Holmes
Even if I could protect my kids from all the nonsense in the world, how long would that last? My kids are going to make friends, some of whom will have SmartPhones and iPads. My kids are going to turn 18 and leave home and discover the wide world. Better to let them get to know about the world, incrementally and on our turf, then to act as if the world isn’t there and then turn them loose. As I discuss in my post Barbie See, Barbie Do, our general approach is to talk about the aspects of culture that disturb us—so my daughter has heard plenty about how I feel when it comes to beauty, brains, and females in our culture. Part of the ongoing discussion is that there’s nothing wrong with enjoying your physical self, or feeling pretty—I wear makeup, nice clothes, and jewelry, and I like those things. My message is always that culture would have us put our self-worth in beauty—and an impossible standard of beauty at that.
This is what I have to do: Go to the 77th page of my WIP, (err, I'll go 7th, seeing as the 77th does not yet exist!) 7th line, and copy the next 7 lines, no cheating! (I kind of already have but you wouldn't want to read 7 lines of nothing now would you?)
2. Political Correctness.
Now on to this week and we would like to see MORE THAN ONE FOLD...my talented DT have done some real stunners sooooo lets get crafting.
- 2,500 Optimum bonus points with purchase of 2 Yes To Cucumbers products.
The absence of a Fairy-story eucatastrophe makes the desperate stand of Húrin’s household appear in bolder relief. They are not allowed to skate around, but must walk through, the deepest depths of the doom of Men. Yet they do so in faithfulness to what good they see, whether beyond the Circles of the World, or in indestructible judgment. The Children of Húrin is thus to Tolkien’s body of work roughly what the eighty-eighth Psalm is to the Psalter: for the Psalmist, like Húrin’s house, was laid in the lowest pits, and yet “unto thee have I cried, O Lord.” [9]
If I can say a few final words for anyone considering a career in architecture, it would be this; take your time, make your own decisions, and be in control of your future. If you want to be an architect, you can be, and don’t have to follow the route most traveled to find the perfect path.
various retailers, starting at $20
I’m going to explain, right now, why a Russian FPS/RPG called Pathologic is the single best and most important game that you’ve never played.
150g (1/3 lb) all purpose flour
OTHER VOICES...
Spilled semen, whether by masturbation, anal penetration, or homosexuality, was not to be tolerated.
Betty MacDonald was right. Having Monica Sone's experiences I'm not sure I would.
But there's some place that he'd rather be
Along with Stanford neurophysiologist Karl Pribram, b. 1919, Talbot says we think with holograms inside our head, using standing waves, interference patterns in the brain just like a TV set lodged in our mind. Together they figured the holographic model explained several phenomena, including:
Let me end this by quoting Annie:
This weekend was awesome.
The study involved five macaque monkeys who were infected intravenously with XMRV. Researchers were studying the monkeys for a variety of reasons. Abbott Labs — which helped fund the study and whose scientists were among the researchers — is one of a number of companies developing tests that could potentially be used to screen the blood supply for XMRV. Abbott scientists have used the XMRV-positive monkey blood in their test development process.
These new generation lamps are easy to install at any outdoor locations. These lamps are environment-friendly as they do not emit UV radiations. Moreover, these lights had been tested for its high shock resistance, efficiency and durability which make it the best in LED lighting category.
(12) Isaiah 42:13
Maybe you would agree with the point that there has to be something wrong with a nation that forces - at gunpoint - its people to stay. Fidel has also been lambasted for his jailing of homosexuals, routine torture of opponents lack of a free media in Cuba.
Then it’s down down down as
find a cheap tailor, make the cuffs your regular size, including the
Remember, to say, "I love you" to your partner and your loved ones, but most of all mean it. A kiss and an embrace will mend hurt when it comes from deep inside of you.
The location of their arrest as shown in their arrest report does not correspond to a specific building, according to Tulsa County property records. The report says they were found in the 6200 block of North Yorktown Avenue.
)1 cup grated raw carrots (2 large)
No one had a job, and things were pretty tough. When we moved, more things had to be left behind, including our Christmas decorations.
Torta Caprese! Did you know there were more Italian desserts than only Tiramisu? :p This is one of them, I've also noticed that Italian recipes use a lot of almonds! It's normally round, but I made a square one...
But I endured in the dark little corner of the universe where people with bad vision exist.
Upon grabbing a stool at the bar, I was greeted by a young lady, and ordered a glass of Cabernet, and was offered a menu. I came here knowing I was going to have a burger tonight, and that was still what I was craving. I know, to be in Trenton and not go to Rossi's or Social for a burger is a sin, but you all know how I love to try new places.
The plot of the episodes is based on the Black Lagoon manga by Rei Hiroe, and features the adventures of a Japanese businessman, Rokuro Okajima, after he is abducted by the members of the ship Black Lagoon and joins their crew under the moniker “Rock.” The story follows a team of pirates/mercenaries known as Lagoon Company, who smuggle goods in and around the seas of Southeast Asia in the 1990s. Their base of operations is located in the fictional city of Roanapur in Thailand, and they transport goods in the PT boat Black Lagoon. When on land, they move around and conduct business using Benny’s 1969 Dodge Coronet R/T (with a ’69 Plymouth Roadrunner side-scoop induction hood). Lagoon Company does business with various clients, but has a particularly friendly relationship with the Russian crime syndicate Hotel Moscow. The team takes on a variety of missions ”which may involve violent firefights, hand-to-hand combat, and nautical battles”in various Southeast Asian locations and when not doing much, the members of the Lagoon Company spend much of their down time at The Yellow Flag, a bar in Roanapur.
But when men grow wiser they will learn how foolish all this is, and that both these kinds of people are necessary, for it takes all sorts of people to make a world."
It would also be good to see beers such as Windermere Pale and Lakeland Gold appearing as guests in Robinson’s pubs around here.
“Speak to me. Why do you never speak. Speak.
You cannot get enough of it.
The Northcoast Pregnancy Help Centers offer valuable resources to women facing pregnancy decisions. The centers also offer free services, like pregancy testing and limited ultrasounds. Linda Luecke Martha Evans explain how they raise funds through a series of Lifewalks, which take place Saturday, October 3rd. www.northcoastphc.org
05 Message To Love
Everything changes. Everything has to change if I am going to create the best possible environment for my animals. I have to try something, observe, record, reflect and try again. Thank God we do this work seasonally so I have time for reflection.
Congratulations Katie, you win 3 digi images from last weeks sponsor Papermom! Could you please e-mail me (Faye) at the address in the sidebar, by Sunday 8 August, so we can arrange for you to claim your prize. If the prize is not claimed by 8 August, another winner will be chosen.
This May, I almost forgot to venture to Bloor Street, Toronto's so called "Mink Mile," to view the breathtaking displays of spring bulbs. Bloor Street has the finest stores, and is in walking distance to museums, restaurants, and the campus of the University of Toronto. Luckily, we've had a long, cool spring, so the displays have lasted a good two weeks longer than usual.
Sometimes it is okay to take a step back and realize you were being ridiculous.
3 race
And we can all communicate
Sign up today, and have an agent for your book tomorrow!
If these two things are present, God’s commandment and our humility, then there is no danger or need, so far as this second man, the emperor, is concerned; we are strong enough for the whole world and must have good fortune and success. But if we have not good fortune, it is certainly because one of the two things is lacking; we are going to war either without God’s commandment, or in our own presumption, or the first soldier, the Christian, is not there with his prayers. It is not necessary here to warn against seeking honor or booty in war; for he who fights in humility and obedience to God’s command, with his mind fixed solely upon the simple duty of protecting and defending his subjects, will forget honor and booty; nay, they will come to him, without his seeking, more richly and gloriously than he can wish.
Round 4: Ch 3. *2 dc in next dc, dc in next 5 dc. Repeat from * around. Join with sl st to top ch of ch 3. (35 dc)
I will regularly bore my son with an evocation of a world in which there was no video recording, no DVDs, no iPlayer or in fact any way to watch a programme again or see one that you had missed or in fact watch anything other than what happened to be on one of the three television channels at the time - BBC1, BBC2 or ITV.
Me: Thanks, Mom, way to show some support. Anyways, it doesn’t matter. It is my best feature, Hubby’s favorite, in fact.
Southside and I settled the tab, thanked the nice waitress – who’ll be celebrating a birthday soon evidently – and we proceeded down the road to our next stop.
You have a chance to win this book if you leave a comment and your email on each designer's blog. Keri Lee will draw three random winners from the comments left between Friday - Monday. The winners will be drawn and notified on Tuesday.
Portability and Connectivity
And don’t even think of writing a less-than hagiographical account of Nelson Mandela. Time magazine’s Richard Stengel has serialized his tributes to Saint Mandela. (Stengel has completed two. Perhaps a third is planned?) But an opposing voice to the media paean for the democratic South Africa and its deity, written by a dissenting South African exile—this cannot be countenanced. “What menaces democratic society in this age is not a simple collapse of order,” forewarned Alexis de Tocqueville, “but a tyranny of mediocrity, a standardization of mind and spirit and condition.” In the context of post-apartheid South Africa, this sameness of mind and spirit manifests in a convergence of opinion - even in the neatly bifurcated America.
Between Monro, Tire Kingdom and Adams Homes, they are complete and utter time suckers.
I am feeling a bit stressed about all the things coming up the next few weeks. A week long felting retreat to prepare for, for which I leave on the 30th. Come back on the 5th, a one day show on the 6th, and a show on the 11th and 12th. It may not sound like much but I am someone who lives a quiet, stay at home life and generally stresses about everything anyway. At least I feel good that I have been finishing things. Having a deadline can be good in that way.
Also added to the following challenges:
Case in point this time is Umno VP Zahid Hamidi. Here, he exhorts Umno cybertroopers to step up their efforts to counter the “hate culture propagated by irresponsible groups against Umno.”
I suppose I’d say we were a dark theme punk/ska band that evolved into an avant garde jazz ska band that evolved into a ska/growlcore band? I’m not sure, really. Mitay Whitay defies categorization!
Seriously, they're not that difficult. Just takes a little patience.
So, I don't know about you, but when I have on the perfect outfit (and it was perfect for my mood for the day) the idea of changing said perfect outfit is nothing less than crazy making. What does one wear, I ask, that somehow will look ok for work, but also allow you to possibly get covered in plaster and dust and shit at the same time? And also, will make you feel as good as the outfit you were just wearing and are now forced to change out of?
And don’t forget to pack lots of extra toilet paper.
He went on and on. From Oedipus to Frued and on to incest. “Diversity in your DNA is really important. You can get to be pretty fucked up if you don’t.” At this point paying attention to my music and my book was impossible. As my hour on the elliptical came to a close, I felt tempted to approach the Talker and confront him. I knew better, however. He was technically not breaking any gym rules, only social ones. I did not foresee either a civil conversation or a foregone solution. I was simply going to have to live with the talking. Once I came to this conclusion, I found myself strangely admiring one aspect of the Talker: his social vivaciousness. True, his choices of topic and voice volume were mostly undesirable, but he still could steer a conversation wherever he so desired. This is a key skill I’ve been trying to hone amongst friends and, most focally, on romantic interests.
The reoccupation and subsequent control of the Crater district were condemned by The Brass. The GOC Middle East Land Forces, Major-General Phillip Tower, feared that reoccupation of the Crater would provoke more disturbances. Tower, a veteran of the North African campaigns and Arnhem, also thought a full reoccupation of Crater was pointless as British withdrawal from Aden was already decided by politicians. Tower authorized a probe into the Crater to be led by Mitchell using the Argylls and other units but Mitchell took the initiative and reoccupied it. Tower instructed Mitchell to "throttle back" on his operations within the Crater. Mitchell stated that he thought Tower’s to be “wet hen tactics”. The situation was described in The Times:
The son when contacted refused to take charge due to the pressure from his wife who had earlier thrown the father in law out because he wetted his pajama accidently on way to the loo in the night. He was called a dog who pisses anywhere,
Just a flying flick of recurring irritation,
Once Erica and her boyfriend Blake starting having sex, they do it all the time, especially when her stepdad isn’t at home. One night Blake had plans with his family and Erica stayed home. As she walks past Stepdad’s office, she hears moaning. She quietly goes in and finds him masturbating to videos of her and Blake having sex. She gets turned on and starts touching herself as well. When he notices, her stepdad is embarrassed and pushes her out of the room. She returns and the two of them proceed to have sex. He tells her this cannot happen again, but she doesn’t agree.
Blah blah blah boring episode where nothing really important happens except for a lot of things that don’t make sense.
Hypnosis is a bridge to the subconscious mind, which houses the emotions, imagination, memories, habits and intuition. It also regulates our autonomic body functions and is the part of the mind that dreams.
Sources say the gang, comprising young Muslim men who sport "SOI'' tattoos, has sprung up on the Glitter Strip relatively recently.
8) Add in the bean sprout and chives. Stir for few more minutes.
The Northern ice and rain that began me nourish me to the end,
5. Reduce heat to medium-low and cook about 3-4 minutes, or until the top is mostly set.
In the day when I cried thou answeredst me, and strengthenedst me with strength in my soul.
Since the new mother breast feeds the baby,she will fell hungry often.Keeping some nutritious snacks / fruits handy is very essential.
There is also FVC % predicted, and FEV1 % predicted which is calculated by a formula based on things like sex, age, height, and weight. So when I get 83% FEV1, that means I blew out 83% of how much air a person with my sex, age, height, and weight SHOULD be able to exhale.
The obsession with square fottage is hopefully a thing of the past. When it comes to a home bigger is not necessarily better. Look at the propotions of your home and garden, building an extension might mean that you lose valuable garden space or you might find that the original front room becomes redundant.
There has been a sudden interest in salt, it even seems that some people are making artisan salts...from different areas of the world. I keep kosher salt for most of my cooking, but my sister-in-law introduced me to sea salt. It's pretty, isn't it?
Article 21 Where an entity or individual offers or uses urban trash, sewage sludge or any other solid waste as agricultural water or fertilizer, it shall make innocuous treatment of the said solid waste and shall make it conform to the relevant standards of the state.
Lockhart is a small community surrounded by beautiful country. Lovely stretches of coast, the stunning Iron Range National Park, the challenging water crossing on Frenchman’s Track, and the amazing Portland Roads, of which you can read in my next post.
Also, I cannot just continue in good deeds and work, but have no faith. My actions must be a result of that faith. Thank You that You are a God I can put my trust in. You have never failed us, and You never will. Thank You for reminding me and changing me. Amen.
6. They Call It Rock & Roll Music
GK: Again, I don't know. But I will say this: If I am asked to work on Brooklyn Tomorrow, I will, of course, do so in my inimitable fashion.
the art of love becomes her covers.
(Photo: my aunt Anne in our new digs)
67. Improving sleep patterns for my daughter (resulting in improving moods for my daughter!)
Starting Weight: 321 lbs
It felt like the first time we brought him home from the hospital a year and a half ago. We had to have a little "class" with the transplant coordinator and doctors on Max's new medications and how/when to give them. The whole discharge process went a lot quicker than I was expecting. Before I knew it we were on our way out the door with our new medications in hand and our follow up appointments scheduled.
On the song Look At The Sun on my record, I had an idea of an acoustic guitar riff. I wanted to record it quickly, just to remember it. Then I worked the whole song on the "demo" guitar. When I recorded the guitar I had the window open and my fan blowing air randomly on the mic. Then when I wanted to record the "real" guitar with the clean sound, there was no character. I kept the "demo" guitar.
Have you ever had Deep Regret?
The heat within one start to slowly falter
And probably some turkey. Probably.
"Mommy, that's so inappropriate."
The picture you see is my first attempt at growing hops in the backyard, these being of the Brewers Gold variety which is used in English and Belgian beers as a bittering hop. I also have a Fuggle vine growing, though it has not produced discernable flowers/cones yet. A late bloomer I suppose. The other picture is of the back deck complete with many of the green and growing things Michelle has been cultivating since earlier this spring. Some things have come up very well, some not as well as expected. As I started to expound in my last post, these things are clear indications of Providence, the outward manifestation of God's guiding hand in the affairs of men and though our planning, preparing, and cultivating are necessary work, the results belong to Him alone. When things work out well, we tend to forget this and attribute success to our own resources and to "natural" law, as if the universe operates on principles that are somehow independent of God.
or the activities we had planned,
Anyways, I used my phone as a light and fought the pants for the keys some more. And yes, I finally won and the keys were free! Now to put on the pants and get myself back home!
My husband thinks I'm a little crazy for how excited I get over new books, especially the non-fiction titles.
What is there today that would prevent them from doing so, other than the growing indoctrination by the government that everybody else owes them something?
4 pcs kalamansi lime (ordinary lime can also be used)
I wrote up the first part of this post yesterday and never got around to clicking publish!
What I liked/disliked:
And jolly nice it was too. In fact, so nice I had it for breakfast.
He tells the first step, you need to move and start feeding your mind with fulfilling steps by reading! Continuing the talk, he explains 5 Keys To Thrive in detail in the video. Tony explains how you can implement them to your life and be able to thrive no matter what your current situation is.
What is joy? A group of people who have bonded together like family. Children who adore each other and sit at a table of mounded, late-night fries, smiling at one another's humor and helping each other when challenges arise. Joy you say? Crass jokes and smart-ass comments, off-beat humor and intimate stories. Food shared and discussed, plans made and re-made. Friends like family....eating cheesecake at midnight.
while talking to the vet about the next course of treatment.
It all started over a decade ago the time my little family and I went without TV for about a year. Despite being raised on television, I managed not to die. But something else died that year. I lost my stamina. Plus my kids ruined it. Eventually, I enjoyed my battle with them for the remote control more than actually having the control. Soon I was watching their shows. So with the exception of one or two series, I lost my will for it. Essentially this: meh.
Queer studies, LGBTQ and Marxism
I love the Mercy Thompson series, it is easily one of my all time favourites. It's got very well developed characters, engaging storylines and each book brings something new to her world. And Mercy herself is one of my top favourite characters. So it goes without saying I was very excited to get my hands on River Marked, and it did not disappoint at all!
I remember the stars, the moon & dancing of the northern lights on dark winter night. The road turned & straightened as the frosted yellow lines passed… As I look out the car window of mine. A memory left & memory gained- I ran my fingers against the window frame, and strained the vision within the music that danced with this moment of time. It is never forgotten but always in the heart .. A way to freedom. -M.R
Yesterday I went to a healing touch session which is an energy-based practice that promotes healing from a Christian perspective. (see www.HTSpiritualMinistry.com) It also involves the laying on of hands and the use of oils. A couple of days ago I was overwhelmed and in tears with all of the appointments, obligations, and loose ends on my plate, the never ending list. This was on top of a restless night’s sleep; basically, I was just tired and crabby. I had never gone to anything like this before and for a brief second considered canceling. I’m so so glad I didn’t cancel. It was so very worth my time! It was about 2 hours that I spent there. The first hour and a half was spent in a restful meditative state reclined on a massage table. The Healing Practitioner, Susan started off by praying over me and Nora out loud. The rest of the time she prayed silently over me and focused on different energy points. It was very relaxing. Prior to the session, she suggested I keep a mental note of any imagery that came to mind. She paused intermittently to write down any thoughts or imagery she herself experienced at each energy point.
ao as she was waiting for everyone to wake up from naps to join her party
In another large, clean bowl, beat together the egg whites and cream of tartar on medium-high speed until stiff, glossy peaks form.
In Genesis 1:27 we read:
but i like taking little fun breaks!
Take a risk. Try it. You might get to like it. After all, look what happened to me, right?
As early as February 1, 1933, the Navy staged a mock attack on Pearl Harbor by the Japanese. The exercise was a disaster. Even in 1933 it was known that Pearl Harbor's defenses were considered, after the mock attack by Japan, a failure. It makes the events of December 7, 1941 even more heart-wrenching. The War Department knew the attack was coming. They did not know when. They did not realize that Pearl Harbor, which was basically a sitting duck, was to be the location of the attack. It was assumed the attack would come in the Philippines.
On 9/11 theUSmilitary were conducting an exercise based on commercial aircraft being hijacked and used as missiles against civilian targets……
Get all Theo Epstein on it and see what happens.
Health has to have priority but sometimes it acts like a bully.
The saying, “Looks could kill” is not an understatement. Though the word kill is only used literally and the word look is sometimes associated with stares. But what is being pointed out here is that looks can definitely kill a person’s chances on landing his or her executive job if the applicant had missed one great factor: appearance.
Culver City, CA (November 7, 2011) –Higher Ground, directed by and starring Academy Award® nominee Vera Farmiga (2010 Best Actress in a Supporting Role, Up in the Air) will be released on a Blu-ray™/DVD Combo Pack on January 10, 2012 from Sony Pictures Home Entertainment. This Sony Pictures Classics film is based on the memoir This Dark World by Carolyn S. Briggs and was an official 2011 selection of the Sundance Film Festival, the Tribeca Film Festival and the Los Angeles Film Festival. The film also stars Academy Award® nominee John Hawkes (2011 Best Actor in a Supporting Role Winter’s Bone), Joshua Leonard (The Blair Witch Project), Donna Murphy (Tangled) and Bill Irwin (Rachel Getting Married). Higher Ground will be available for an SLP of $45.99 for the Blu-ray/DVD Combo Pack. Special features will include a commentary with Director/actress Vera Farmiga, actor Joshua Leonard and producer Renn Hawkey, deleted scenes, a behind the scenes featurette and a Los Angeles Film Festival Q & A.
Don't you just love when a little 5 minute investment can save LOADS and minutes in the future? Plus, an organizing junkie like me feels obligated to do at least one project a weekend to keep things from going downhill fast, so when I find these types where a tiny bit of time offers a huge payoff, I can kick back and enjoy the rest of the weekend without worry!
Your Holy Name! Amen!
7) IMPORTANT! Leave your unbaked macarons to stand for an hour before putting them in the oven. This process should not be skipped because this is how the 'feet' are formed.
Everything I do, I want to question whether I could be doing it better. Am I using my resources as well as I can? Am I focusing on the task at hand enough? Are there other ways to tackle a problem? Am I being present enough? Can I save more, do more, be more and give more?
Looking forward to: Our 4D ultra sound at the end of this month!! I cannot WAIT to see detail pictures of our little noodle.
Classes with the North Koreans aren't much different than with my kids, except their English is much more basic and they're much older. They're all rather good-natured and (as far as I can tell) happy to see me. I teach a basic class that has a core enrollment of three students, with two others who drift in and out as it suits them.
I love the rhythm of words and coming up with original ways of capturing and communicating the emotion evoked by my MC's situation, so those are my 'trope creating' moments. Sometimes they're right there and other times I lose sleep coming up with the best way to avoid cliche. Synonyms are my absolute favorite way of brainstorming - and I confess I'm partial to alliteration (in moderation ... at least, I TRY to keep it to a minimum).
just to picture the way it used to be-
I thought that, rather than stomp off in the huff,if only I bided my time and was a good and supportive friend, she might come to see that as more profound and important than any "spark" and I might still "win the day". I felt like one of King Arthur's knights riding out on a quest. Well, I did say that I was a hopeless romantic. Many of you by now may be laughing your heads off or feeling your last meal making an unwelcome return but I don't care. Even Don Quixote had a certain comic dignity, didn't he?
The rest of the week was busy, and I didn't have time for a long run. But I sure thought about it.
After Money Jihad’s latest post about Somalia’s charcoal trade funding jihadists, we received a note from a reader wondering how lucrative third world charcoal business could really be. Some background is in order to answer that question.
He was born Raymond Bolger, in Dorchester, Mass. in 1904 – one of the few people in this book who actually performed using his given name. His father fell ill when he was a teenager, forcing him to began that stint as a bank teller, on top of his schoolwork. In 1920 he saw Fred Stone perform in Jack O’Lantern and was so inspired that he decided to become a dancer himself. Within two years, he was touring New England and the mid-Atlantic with the Bob Ott Music Comedy and Repertory Company. He briefly teamed up with a gentleman named Ralph Sanford for a vaudeville act called “A Pair of Nifties”, doing singing, dancing, and comedy. In the twenties and thirties he continued to work both vaudeville and the Broadway music stage. He debuted as a single at the Palace in 1927 and then worked in a Gus Edwards sketch with with Leonata and Lola Lane called “Ritz Carlton Nights”.
C1-2 Quadriplegic with a 223 High Bowling Game
"Bow Before The Glory of Rome"
The door sign read “Traditional Chinese Medicine.” The doctor was sweetly round, about 65. She felt my wrist pulse a long, long, long time. She looked at my throat with a conventional plastic flashlight, and checked out my tongue. We discussed my bowels (embarassingly with my student translating), even though my problem is a deep cough.
Have a nice day my friends :)
VPBJN Blog (vpbjnblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Julie Genovese
Those who marched were there, those who saw the film, saw the film, so they know they were being lied to by CNN or ABC when the numbers who attended were reported to be in the tens of thousands, or, as I understand it, in one instance the marchers were referred to in terms of “scores” of people.
I remember seeing Carrie at the grave, her red hair flowing down her back, and looking like a movie star with her aunt's black hat on top of it. And I saw a bit of a smile on her. A small one, you'd hardly notice. And I thought to myself, she's enjoying this. She's enjoying the attention.
Did you notice that I read concerning Abraham, “when he was tried” or put to the test? He passed with flying colours.
It does make you forget for a little while,
1. Cook the spaghetti according to the instructions, till al dente
Because, frankly, the contrast between the old milongueros and their young partners doesn´t make their dance look better. On the contrary, I think.
Anyway, as we read, we work on all of our skills...context clues, plot, main idea, details, fact/opinion, summary, etc...the possibilities are endless. Each night, their homework is to write about what we've read (a chapter), but I will ask them a STAAR question stem that they have to answer. (We do this in class, as well.) This idea has really sent me on a more open learning path with them. And it holds their interest!!
1 crest
"The fact that we have the right to sell beer has to be a part of the law."
Fetal Positions Inside The Womb
Hebrews 10:10; John 17:19
So today I went out looking for work experience, literally everyone was saying no, but luckily I'm in between an art gallery and a vintage shop, which should be lovely!
Vintage Solo-Sleepeasy Plastic Brush rollers. Softer plastic, smooth rounded bristles and produces almost identical results as Wil-hold rollers. Feels a little prickly all over but comfortable when your used to it. I find these are less pressure sensitive than Wil-hold rollers so better for resting your head on a pillow.
Today is international ME/CFS awareness day. Please help spread the message so that people with ME/CFS don't have to live with the uncertainty of having no diagnosis and, hence, no treatment. I was lucky – my PCT have a Chronic Fatigue Clinic and I was able to attend therapy sessions and get the support I needed in order to get better. Again, this is very rare. There are very few such clinics in the country, but hopefully raising ME/CFS awareness can change this.
…yeah, I’d describe exactly what it is you’re looking at, but frankly I have no idea myself.
We decided to give them a try at around the 6 mile mark yesterday morning, on the basis that they are supposed to give you a quick burst of energy to then run/walk the rest of the distance required.
After the experience of having 12 people talking at once while trying to order coffee, the group was gracious enough to use their “little” voices while everyone ordered their meal. The cone of silence that suddenly descended over the table was eerie, but it made the process of placing the orders run much more efficiently, not to mention quickly. Once the coffee and tea cups were filled again, everyone welcomed John Wilsey back from his annual visit to Hawaii who was more concerned about the shark attack two days ago just two miles from where he surfed most of the time he was on the North Shore. John also added that tourists are offered the chance to climb into shark cages and feed tiger sharks just off the North Shore Coast! Thatʼs stretching the aloha spirit just a bit too far everyone thought.
The New Yorker, Fortune Magazine, Investors’ Business Daily and Inc. have all profiled John Zogby. He is a well-respected, popular lecturer and panelist who has appeared on all four major U.S. television networks, and dozens of U.S. and international cable news programs.
In 2009, the ILP finally went bust, and the Poetry.com domain was acquired by self-publishing service Lulu.com (I blogged about this when it happened). Lulu kept the functionality of the Poetry.com website--including the thousands of poems published by Poetry.com participants over the years--but discontinued the vanity anthologies and the merchandising aspects of the business.
Onion - 1 medium
I know everyone won’t agree but I’ve always felt that film noir works well in a gothic setting, where the atmosphere is necessarily thick and crimes (particularly crimes of passion) are a basic ingredient. In addition, the social constraints that govern the characters’ lives and actions help to increase the feeling of pressure, while the ornately forbidding homes where many such stories are played out can be just as menacing in their own way as any rain-slicked urban sidewalk. I think the fact that noir isn’t a real genre is one of its great strengths; this lends it a flexibility allowing theme, mood and look to assume as much importance as time and place. Fritz Lang’s House by the River (1950), dripping in heavy gothic atmosphere, confined for the most part to the titular house, and exploiting the suffocating moral code of its period setting, is most definitely film noir. It’s an interesting and at times visually striking work, but not an entirely successful one. However, I’ll go into the reasons for that later.
I’m breaking up with you.
Sentiment is a free stamp, stamped with Brilliance Rocket red gold.
Anyone wishing to submit evidence to the Finance Committee can do so via email: financecommittee@wales.gov.uk or by writing to: The Clerk to the Finance Committee, National Assembly for Wales, Cardiff Bay, Cardiff, CF99 1NA.
The kids, as essayed by Nell Regan and Patrick Regan III, real-life twins (both of 'em), play it like they just wandered off of a cereal commercial and were looking for their stage mother. As far as their acting goes, it's made up of a lot of staring. At things. At people. At each other. But when they talk in their nasally California mumble, you'll wish for more staring.
159 ***1. “Notes from Charles Dickens’s Christmas Carol.” Interpretation, vol. 7, pp. 52-74 (January 1978). (Source: Item D-XII/12/1975, below. Incorporated in Item B-3, above, pp. 123-41, 426-33 (1983). Reprinted in Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, November 23, 1989, p. 3, November 30, 1989, p. 3, December 7, 1989, p. 3, December 14, 1989, p. 3, December 21, 1989, p. 3, and December 28, 1989, p. 3.)
Bless our Megan cried so much.
What he means by progressive partnerships is SNP Councils and SNP Government.
I would never have thought to put these cool colors together! Rebecca is a smart girl ;)
at least let me call off before they call me
All at various stages in their lives, a group of British seniors finds themselves at The Best Exotic Marigold Hotel (For the Elderly and Beautiful) in India.
The first attack on the right to bear arms is found on page 1323.
If dried lavender isn't your thing, just go with the lavender-tinted icing! I'm sure they will still be delicious!
That's it, simple but I am reasonably pleased with the final result.
I can respect that, but I have never understood that philosophy. It’s a movie … it’s not real. If you’re not disturbed by the undead in movies, then how can you worry about the unreal? There are worse movies than the Harry Potter series being absorbed by kids every day.
down, to have
Citizenship: U.S.
Never had to beg for love or words, and never had to steal.
The master mind behind it was not as everyone thinks, Chippy Shaik, he was small fry. It was the double agent and Apartheid spy Joe Modise, now deceased, but the former Minister of Defence.
* 1/2 green mango, peeled and cut into matchsticks
It is fun to show you that I can do something else other than just cards. Thanks so much Leanne for the wonder challenge.
Fill cupcake liners with level 1/4 cup of batter. Bake for 17-20 minutes until tops are just beginning to brown. Cool completely before frosting.
I hate not having my computer, I can't wait til its fixed.
Steven Fiedler, who attended the meeting as a member of the Juniper Park Civic Association, said there is another complicating factor aside from the potential wetland investigation. He says there are two 46-inch pipes on Seneca Avenue and Vermont Place that the DEC wants sealed before any phase two work moves forward.
He’s also called the Cat. Not because of his sometimes feline, feminine moves on stage but because of his multiple brushes with death. He has had a troubled path, from the very off. A Basildon boy on the verge of going bad, family troubles, grim future, few prospects. Then along came MLG and Fletch, electro-pop, bewildering ambition and bam…Depeche Mode was born and Dave Gahan was saved. Through the journey of teeny bopper pop, to the dark side of addiction and self-loathing, to the belief that he could rule the world as a rock God, Gahan flatlined twice, overcame heroin addiction and has finally learned to live with his demons.
Although Labour are in a bit of a pickle at the moment and do not have a single policy or position worthy of seripus discussion this will change. Make no mistake about that!
Choose between sitting mode for youngest baby and motion-activated as they grow
Like I said, It still shakes me.
Love can melt the roughest men;
Of course, the most obvious counterargument one could raise against Nietzsche in his critique of womanhood is to point out that most—if not all—of the criticisms he makes against the opposite sex here, is equally present in the behavior of the masculine gender. Men, too, indulge in vain interests, and have a tendency to become bitter and sensitive as age starts to diminish their charm and virility (not to mention their hairline). When it comes to the issue of competition—which Nietzsche characterizes as a vanity—it is only fair to say that if the philosopher wants to state that the highest contempt against women comes from other women, then one has to also acknowledge how (in light of all of human history) the greatest focus of contempt against men, has been other men. Thus, doesn’t allow itself to conclude that Nietzsche’s criticism of femininity are more accurately understood as criticism against humanity, in general. Personally, I doubt that Nietzsche would even object to any of the statements I have made above, and would probably add that they are entirely compatible with his views. Furthermore, I suspect that the philosopher would make the counter claim that my attempt at refuting his views on women, arises largely from my superficial interpretation of his words[11] (i.e. I’m eager to refute his ideas here, because I already decided his views are wrong long before I even started this essay; this would not be a false claim, in and of itself, but whether or not it is the driving force in my analysis, I’ll leave to the reader to judge).
Baby, I've been, breaking glass in your room again
Essentially what this code says is – does the session variable ‘teer’ (our Volunteer Object) exist? If yes, then get me the committee array that the Volunteer submitted. Because of the way we deal with the post variable ‘committee’, I know that a PHP ArrayObject exists (see above). So all we have to do is search the array for the value ‘Finance’. Note the search is case sensitive! If a match is found we select this checkbox using the Checked attribute.
Negative energy surged and arched across the battlefield; Meryk, Pandora and Brother Vang took up positions behind Aurakraul’s immobile form while Zantric and Emma strode ahead and Anselme took to the shape of a giant eagle that their trio might engage the lich and his ‘dragon.’ A torrent of lightning from Cassandra tore through the rotting dragon yet did not affect King Kroma himself–and once more, the high priests reacted to further bulwark their magical defenses, one poising to interrupt the sorceress’ spells–and dispelling her effort to magically quicken her comrades with haste.
Hama beads are close to my heart, because the year we met – almost a decade ago now – the two of us attended the holiday club her parents ran in a Shropshire Methodist church hall. On the craft evening, we set for an hour and a half sorting out all the mixed beads into different coloured piles, while the teenagers around us got on with the designing and ironing.
Preheat to 350°
Personally, I have a lot of decisions to make over the next several months. No, we don’t have a prognosis other than there is no cure. I had a grandma survive 3 years after diagnosis with this cancer, so I am hoping we have at least 2 more years with him. That said, I have been feeling the emotional pressures quite a bit. How do I deal with all of that? I don’t know, but somehow I am. I can honestly say that I am not getting much emotional support from those who I thought would be there for me. Instead, they have their own agenda’s now and what I thought was a stronger relationship building between us has become unraveled. I blame one person and it’s not me nor is it the other person. I blame a 3rd person for pulling the other away.
Girl opens blue velvet box to reveal an engagement ring
That’s like saying that the rash of mass killings in high schools is an epidemic reserved for maladjusted white children has something to do with this case as well. It doesn’t nor does the focus on black on black crime. Why are we trying to put more shit into an already shitty game?
After many grueling hours of researching life insurance companies and comparing quotes, you submit your application only to be told that you are not eligible for coverage. While you probably have an opinion about whether or not this decision was fair, the best thing you can do is to get a second quote. No two insurance companies follow the same underwriting policies and their guidelines are never truly set in stone. Learn from the decision and find another company and agent who are willing to offer you decent coverage at a reasonable price.
I wanna be kissed by you
You have 8 chances to win, since there are 8 blogs to visit. In addition to one winner from each listed blog, we at Copic will be reading through comments. If we find a testimonial that we really like, then we will contact that person to use their story for the CHA booth and whomever we choose would get an equal prize to the random winners. So make your comments good, and make them different on each blog for even more chances to win! There will probably be two or three winners chosen total on comments, as well as the one winner for each listed blog (The testimonial winners will not be announced right away, but random winners will).
We all want to change the world
I wouldn’t say they “jumped the shark” with Ill Communication, but I found their albums after 1993 to be far less memorable than their prior work.
We have by now stopped on the hard shoulder while we try and sort her out, stopping her from drowning in her own vomit. We manage, but ParaGirl is gagging. "I don't do vomit", she gasps between hiccups. Well, you are in this job, and in the back of an ambulance swimming in it, so you just have to.
openly in the armed forces must be carefully derived, sufficiently
And then texting came along, which only served to intensify my addiction – emoticons became my insurance policy against misinterpretation. When you only have a sentence or two to convey your message, there is a lot of room for misunderstandings. For example, you go out drinking with your friends, and you send your best friend this text the next morning:
So, there it is. The great equalizer. It doesn’t matter which form of education you use. The answer is not hidden in a paradigm. You may not believe it when I say it, but hopefully you’ll acknowledge it from Ken Ham.
It comes down to this. One of President Obama's Best Friends Forever when it comes to foreign leaders is Turkey's Islamist Prime Minister Tayipp Erdogan.
Remember the friend who knew the itinerary? One day as I was telling her about our most recent little escapade, she wagged her finger at me, gave me the ‘no bullshit’ look, and said “You’re falling for him.” And I was. I was falling too far, too fast. I was totally smitten with this man.
What is going on with the rear addition is visible from the street on the top-floor addition: patina-copper panels extend back and down the building, an L-shaped wrapper over and behind the brick-and-stone existing building.
Mercadona is in the middle of a public relations disaster after the deaths of several dogs in the Costa Blanca were linked to their own brand pet food.
I will sit enthroned on the mount of assembly,
Alberta is going to get a change, we need a change, but some are left worried about how much of a change it will be. I for one don't want to be propelled into the the 70s with old thinking because rural Alberta hates the interweb.
With the cost of gas hovering close to $4.00 a gallon, we didn’t want to go too far and thought it would be fun to drive the scenic route 2 to the town, Leavenworth. It’s located about 115 miles from Seattle. Leavenworth is a small Bavarian style village nestled in a beautiful valley surrounded by tall mountain peaks. The last time I visited the place was about 15 years ago. Although the scenery was still amazing, the town felt more like a tourist trap. Especially, when a grilled bratwurst on a hot dog bun cost $11.
RUN STRONG. RUN HAPPY. RUN HEALTHY.
3. Salsa
I'll show you her "real" birthday quilt once she bring it back home :)
My case of tandem-itis isn't too bad and is easily curable. It has to do with switching gears...let me explain for the non-pilots.
“My father replied, ‘We belong to the other side, General, and can’t serve you against our duty.’ General Howe replied, ‘That is alright; stick to your country, or stick to your principles, but Howard, you are my prisoner and must guide my men over the hill.’ My father made some further objection, but was silenced by the general, who said, ‘You have no alternative. If you refuse I shall shoot you through the head.’”
Me: "Yep, that would be perfect!"
This mega list should be helpful when determining how all the different facets of your marketing are performing. When creating a data-driven marketing team, consider using tools to manage your reporting. Ultimately, you’ll be making smart, data-driven decisions and your marketing will be better for it.
The meeting is open to the public.
All this then, He says, I have spoken unto you, that My joy may be in you; that those things may give you encouragement that give encouragement to Me; that you may face perils bravely, girding yourselves with the hope of those who will be saved; and, if suffering come upon you in this work, that ye may not be brought low into the feebleness of apathy, but may joy more abundantly, when the pleasure of Him That willeth that all men should be saved and come to the knowledge of the truth is fulfilled by you. For I, too, rejoiced at this, and thought My sufferings very sweet. When then, He says, you elect to have this joy, which I thought became Myself, then you will have it perfect and complete.
I’m sorry? Was… I supposed to laugh at that? Was he being sarcastic? Was Shallan being sarcastic? Wh… what?
He could have competition in the Superman department however, as on the other side of the country, Florida’s Christian Taylor won the triple jump (54’ 8.75”), took second in the long jump (26’ 10.5”) and finished off the meet with a leg on the winning 4x4 (3:02.69) – he’s run 45.55 in his only attempt at the open race this year – while competing in a meet marred by multiple delays and bad weather!
“And yet there is no way to stop it, if it is my fate.” He gathered me against him and pushed us both up to our feet, shaking the blanket from his shoulders. He guided me toward the door but did not pull away, and I savored his closeness. “Come. You must go back to your chambers. If Brychan finds you here, or if someone sees us and informs him, he will kill us both.”
Joseph Kosma La Grande Illusion
Just because I do not find a particular outlook credible or quite on the mark, does not mean I know for sure that it is truly not right. But if you come at me all angry and bowed up because I doubt and question, I am not swayed. That reaction only makes me think that whatever you believe must be bunk because you are an angry hypocrite.
We seem to bring good luck to the Yankees. On the previous game we attended last season, the team got two grand slams, which is rare. On the game we attended last week versus the Oakland As, the team got THREE grand slams, which is unprecedented in the history of the entire league. The moment was all the more exciting given the fact that we’d waited an hour and a half in the rain for the game to start, and the Yankees were several runs behind for the first few innings.
If you are picked and you didn’t do the MUST another winner will be picked!!!
And then Shag turned up!
2 fluffy throw pillows in the perfect color!! (Already washed and on the couch before they could get there pic taken! :) (They were also 30% off – I think they were $3.99?? each before the 30% off)
Only in mental health do you leave hospital BECUASE something is broken, to the background noise of the health service frantically washing their hands of a geriactric, bed blocking, walking (well, wheelchairing), talking (without ever stopping to draw breath, possibly she has evolved to inhale through her ears thus ensuring the stream of warped conciousness never ceases for a millisecond) Medical Encyclopedia of Maladies.
* Spacious shopping basket
If you can slowly amass enough support, particularly in the low-hierarchy team environment (one that is therefore more likely to adopt social media tools) you can begin to introduce social computing behaviours and interactions, using these tools, as a group norm, and as a group norm, the group will eventually adopt the behaviour and reinforce that ‘this is the way we do stuff’.
“But Philip was impatient with himself; he called to mind his idea of the pattern of life: the unhappiness he had suffered was no more than part of a decoration which was elaborate and beautiful; he told himself strenuously that he must accept with gaiety everything, dreariness and excitement, pleasure and pain, because it added to the richness of the design.”
For entertainers it was an artificial reprieve. Many of the vaudevillians who’d managed to hang on through the 1930s were finally forced to retire once the U.S.O. initially disbanded following World War Two. One of vaudeville’s countless “second deaths”.
Just want to let you know what I have lined up for in the new year.
And I have to agree. War brings out the worst of mankind. Just think about the quantity of innocent men, women and children that die in a war. Human lifes that didn’t have anything to do with that war.
I went to my first ever writing workshop last week, and it was my own workshop. (Meaning that I had to stand at the front of the room rather than slouch in the back row.) I kept expecting the writing police to arrive at any moment and charge me with “workshopping without a clue.” But that didn’t happen. Because I actually knew what I was doing! (I just didn’t know I knew.)
In an online world increasingly dominated by dynamic communities such as those on Facebook and Twitter, media groups (and individual journalists) can now be part of the public conversation.
the sacred grove and the storehouse of riches;
Parasailing is an activity whereby you ascend through the sky while hanging from a parachute and being towed by a speedboat or other vehicle. It is a recreational activity where a person is towed behind a boat or other vehicle while attached to a specially designed parachute, known as a parasail.
Unfortunately, the replicators found the device and sped up time, so now they have had centuries to develop advanced technology themselves. This, if it need to be told, is specifically where the Asgard blew it. One of the things I love most about the Asgard is that even though their mistakes are absolutely disastrous, they will never truly admit because they are so advanced beyond other races, nor do they lose their arrogance when asking for help. Thor takes the Prometheus back to Earth, beams up a hefty supply of food and weapons, and plots a course for Hala before a reluctant Jack can say no. Thor punctuates all this with what amounts to “We do not know what kind of technology they have come up with in the last few hundred years, but we are pretty sure it is bad ass. Try not to get killed.”
Can anyone out there could use kids clothes, size 10-12??? I have all of Alyssa's clothes from last winter and nothing fits. Everything is practically brand new and before I take it to Goodwill, I would like to give it to someone I know that could use it. She also has an assortment of winter jackets, snow pants and boots that are like new! So let me know if you have a need or know of someone that does. I will be glad to ship it out!
This rather fine sign in Catford is largely obscured by the bank next door. As so often, this isi a mixed blessing: while it is now easy to miss and difficult to photograph, it has been protected from the worst of the elements. Indeed, the difference in shade between the upper and lower parts shows how important that protection has been.
for supporting iHaveADream Creations in its facebook page.
It’s also my prayer that God will always guide me in all my endeavors in life, especially in all the difficult and uncertain times. And I thank Him for the friendships and that comes my way.
- Clothing
This evening, Mom goes out alone. I stay with Dad. He seems almost all better.
disastrous Austin Beer Festival that was held last Sat at the Travis County Expo Grounds. The complete fiasco – well documented online – has contaminated the market for beer festivals – especially ones run by private companies.
Now here is a little challenge for the lying old git:
Like I said in my earlier post, physical courage (such as reacting in an emergency or because you are the only person who can) is different than standing out against the crowd. Humans are herd animals, after all; and it is difficult to be the first to step forward. Moral courage is the most difficult one to find within yourself. Because moral courage is present exactly when you do stand against a crowd.
I’m not 100% old lady since I like contemporary music too: Taylor Swift, Selina Gomez, J-Lo, Owl City, Back Street Boys, Klute, some Gwen Stefani, Lady Gaga and a little Enrique (his older songs).
Todays cookbook has definitely been one that fits into the category of neglected. It’s Pieminister by Tristan Hogg and Jon Simon, and when I bought it I knew, absolutely knew that I would from that day on bake pies every week and be like the perfect 50′s housewife: pinny on, oven gloves in hand holding a steaming hot pie that would cool on (where else?) the kitchen windowsill. I even imagined having a Homer like person in the family to wolf it all up before dinner. Oddly enough, this scenario never materialised and the cookbook went on the bookshelf to gather dust. I get these strange little fantasies in my head every now and then with a cookbook, but it soon passes and it becomes just another cookbook in my collection. This cookbook does have some pretty amazing looking recipes in it, all pies of course, ranging from sweet and savoury. Its divided into seasons, and the recipes have really creative and interesting names such as ‘Lucky Ducky Pies (duck confit pie), ‘Poussin Boots’ (chicken pie) and ‘The Hedonist Pie’ (chocolate pie) which make them seem even more appealing than pies already are. A lovely friend of mine from school days came round for dinner, so I decided to finally give Pieminister a go, despite the fact that the weather has been smashing and is not really traditional pie eating weather. But conventions were made to be broken, and if I’m ever going to break with convention then I can tell you it will only ever be with cooking. I chose Hunters Chicken pie which takes all the elements of the pub dish hunters chicken and chucks it into a pie. So you’ve got chicken in a creamy, mustardy sauce, onions slowly cooked into a BBQ relish, all topped with cheese and then encased in puff pastry. I love hunters chicken and can now say that I also love Hunters Chicken Pie! Its not as in your face as the pub dish, but much more subtle and the creamy sauce combined with the melted cheese is a winner. And theres bacon in the sauce too, which can only help make this pie an absolute diamond. Plus, what can I say about piping hot puff pastry other than that it is magnificent with pretty much anything. (If you need more convincing on this subject, make ham and cheese empanadas and consider yourself convinced). I didn’t even consider making my own puff pasty from scratch, just buy it from the chilled section in the supermarket. Top chefs in top restaurants do this, so don’t be a martyr, and just do it the easy way. If you want to create thousands of layers of butter from scratch be my guest, but believe me no one is going to think its a good idea. Leave it to Jus-Rol.
Are you praying for someone else today? If you have a specific prayer request, I would like to pray for you. Feel free to leave your prayer request in the comments below, or e-mail me at sheensteve@gmail.com. It would be a blessing to pray for you. Enjoy your weekend, people!
Death is just another path, one that we all must take.
Some think the oppression and social engineering began with Political Correctness or the advent of New Labour under Blair, but in fact it is part of the Multi-Racialists’ mentality. The first act of positive discrimination was in 1950 when Minister of Food John Strachey(L) announced that no Government contracts would go to caterers who did not employ coloured people. In 1955 Smethwick a Conservative candidate for the council Harold had his election addresses printed in Urdu as well as English as did Conservative General election candidate John Wells did too. In 1964 Enid Blyton was being pilloried for her book "The Little Black Doll". Also in 1964 the Campaign Against Racial Discrimination sent out forms for general election candidates to sign pledging not to us race as an issue and in 3 constituencies all the candidates agreed not to mention race! Meanwhile, back at the narrative –
What are you up to this fine Sunday morning?
Rel's brain caught up and he jerked back, stammering. Taslin grabbed his head, roughly covered his mouth. "Quiet!"
The Shoe Team
Yesterday afternoon, as I was joining some friend in the B Atrium, this guy came over, I guess to talk. But the thing is, I couldn’t hear anything he was saying for the life of me. I was caught up in the middle of three different groups of my own friends, people I’ve known throughout the years at the school. I had to keep turning back around to ask him what he said after getting distracted. I honestly could not hear him any of the three times I turned back to him to ask what he said. Someone was jumping up to hug me, then someone else was high-fiving me, and by the time he repeated himself the last time, someone else was literally screaming, “Megan! Megan! Megan! Megan!” in my right ear. I turned around once more, and he had walked away.
On Monday Ryann sported her first ponytail. Dang that little thing was hard to get in, but it was SO cute. We made some cloud dough and had a blast playing in it. Unfortunately the pony tail didn't last long (nor did her outfit) so by lunch time she was looking a bit of a hot mess. After nap Ryann hung out with me at my printer while I worked with my rep on some client invitations.
Romney won in Nevada. I did see that. The Suns finally won a basketball game after about 8 losses in a row. I hear these things second hand. I didn't witness them personally. I was out for the count by then.
Okay so obviously this challenge is finished for the month of March but, I would still like to share with you the card I made. Here is the sketch you had to follow ...
You may catch a glimpse of God in some of the other articles in the Spiritual Writings page. Click here to go there.
of breath
Now Eleanor? Angel! Sleeps like that’s her goal in life. I haven’t watched an infomercial in the last 3 weeks. Hopefully I can keep this up. Or she can keep this up.
Those of us in denominations that ordain women might like to think that we, at least, are beyond this, but perceptions, attitudes, and most extensively language, persist that unfortunately continue to reinforce these kinds of ideas.
The manuscript Blue Lines is the fictional coming of age narrative of a young California woman Key Yemaya Walker, and her 2 year growing journey through school, love, and life period piece, written by Kenneth Suffern, Jr., taking place at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill between the years of 1997 – 1998. Loosely based on true events, and experiences during that time, told through the eyes and voice of the main female protagonist, a freshman first attending the school.
Turning away from him, she pulled out her mobile and pressed a key to speed dial a number. “Julie? Sorry love, I’ll be a while longer than I said. Some dickhead just knocked me into the biggest puddle of mud you’ve ever seen, I’m going to go back home and get changed. See you in an hour or so if that’s okay? Grace is there, yeah?”
They were playing the game, which of his hit songs would open the show. Krystal was sure he would use his original hit, “One Time,” but Shannon argued in favor of “Baby” because she thought it would get the crowd pumped up more.
of your whispers to my heart.
She proceeded to tell me that I had conned my way to being invited to Grand Ma Normal Family's house and that I had done so by complaining to her about how miserable I was. In truth, I have told my grandmother only that I am a bit bored and want to do something productive, so I decided I’d take up her offer to help out around the house. Of course, I am quite accosted, but with my grandfather’s current medical condition that knowledge would only serve to exacerbate an already enormous strain on my grandmother's shoulders. I just hope that I can make things somewhat easier for her.
To make the topping, put the icing sugar in a food processor and whiz briefly to remove any lumps.
ALL PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF THE BOOK WILL BE DONATED TO CANCER RESEARCH UK, AND THE BREAST CANCER CHARITIES OF AMERICA.
Daniel Stern ("Home Alone") and Matt Frewer ("Eureka") put the cool in Yule in the Hallmark Channel Original Movie, Battle of the Bulbs. The film is about dueling neighbors whose Christmas decorating rivalry turns so outrageous, it puts the "no" in "Noel" for the small town sponsoring the annual fete. Hallmark Channel is the biggest holiday destination in television.
"The State of the Climate report shows “unequivocally that the world is warming and has been for more than three decades”.
In the pond two black ducks took off and a wood duck hid along the bank. Last year the wood duck, not as easily spooked as the others, nested here.
Hard boiled eggs
Whew... Ok, now I'll sit down and finish this on the computer... Ok... itenerary...
As a child, several times I was shipped off to visit my grandparents during the summer. I would come home fluent in Russian. Even now, sometimes in movies, I will pick up on words that I know. Unfortunately, my days of being somewhat bi-lingual are long gone.
﻿﻿... and my hours are crazy long at the moment...
A good night
It matters because the signs that we wear at the Kensington Clinic are likely the last prolife messages that these women will see before making a final decision about the wee life they are carrying. It matters because we are a last line of defence. It matters because God loves these families... and so too must we. It matters because "they will know we are Christians by our love". It matters because we want the signs to be compelling - because this is life and death we're talking about.
‘Write me a poem!’ They demand, without any thought to how the Poet is going to fill his tummy.
Death descended from the darkening sky.
Make sure the check out these other ladies... they are so creative!!
Corresponding to the novel, the film is structured in three parts. It follows Kathy (Carey Mulligan, An Education, 2009), Ruth (Keira Knightly, Pride & Prejudice, 2005) and Tommy (Andrew Garfield, The Social Network, 2010) through Hailsham in the 1960′s, young adulthood at the Cottages in the 1970′s, and lastly in the 1990′s where we see the final destination of their lives in completion. While the beginning part is the weakest, lacking the depth and details of the book, such a shortfall is compensated by the excellent performances of the three child actors as the young counterparts, Izzy Meikle-Small (Kathy), Charlie Rowe (Tommy) and Ella Purnell (Ruth). The congruence of young Kathy with her adult role played by Mulligan is particularly impressive.
Thank you to Tom2000000000000 for the news.
Asleep At The Wheel
Author: Séverine Mas, avocate
Mikkeller Black
In the end, our call is to be a people and a place where the power of Christ transforms lives – through becoming more like Him (discipleship), through being loved and shaped in community (fellowship), and through being met, loved, and restored at our needs and wounds (mission).
As in the previous book, Roth doesn’t shy away from hitting our favourite characters with major blows, but as there is a lot more life-threatening action in this book than in Divergent, those blows, in whatever form, aren’t reserved for just the end. I was close to tears on more than one occasion over the dirty tactics of the cold Erudite Jeanine. Knowing this from the previous book, it is foolish to get too attached to some characters you get to know better, yet impossible not to do. In more ways than one, this book is an incredibly hard and brutal read, but much like a car crash, you can’t turn away.
Cover the sauce pan and place it in the freezer for several hours, or until the milk is very cold and a small amount of ice crystals have formed around the edge of the pan.
Heights.
I think I know why Obama bows to everybody. As everybody knows, Barry is a proud member of the Church of Wearing Your Multiculturalism On Your Sleeve. One of the tenets of the faith is that practitioners have to make outsized gestures not to actually accomodate people from other cultures, but instead to show just how much the diversity-mongers tolerate and accept the Other. When you’re a multi-cultist, it’s not about respecting other peoples, it’s about making that everyone else sees what a swell person you are when you’re around ’ethnic people’.
And then there are days like today, where all I can do is cry and wonder why.
a while ago i saw this boy
♥ Link to the blogger who gave you the award.
The DVD comes with a CD with original live music from BACKYARD! Get it or forever repent!
Time turns our thoughts to higher things
Those were the days...
I can't believe this weather. I still haven't planted anything and won't until after Easter. I've seen it snow here in April. I may get the rest of the soil turned in the garden either today or tomorrow. More likely tomorrow. Am trying to find someone willing to till it and a couple of other spots.
Over my 50 years of competing, relationships are established with runners, like Ron McAndrew who I first competed against in 1968. Relationships often established actually during the race itself. Not a conversation as you might have when training of course but a bit of race banter and then the inevitable after race post mortem.
Nestled in the high mountains sits the village of Dragon Well, once it was but a poor and isolated place.
Arcadia Cereal City
Snowburst Embossing Folder
Where’s an Artoo unit when you need one? Hell, I’d settle for a chick in a metal bikini. Great, my last thoughts are a nerdy fanboy’s. What the… a helicopter?! Allen, quick!
2 enabling
But then he mentioned the dread words - the new Leeds. Huddersfield's appeal is precisely because it's not Leeds. Smart yellow brick for Huddersfield, dreary red brick for Leeds; countryside in Huddersfield, a few shabby parks in Leeds. While Leeds has a decent selection of boozers, Huddersfield's are better and it also has its own breweries.
When I think of a first love, I think of the moments in my life where love has changed me or more so in my case, where I have become so dumb and full of endorphins that I forget about other important things like going to work every day and eating. There are many first loves in one’s life, here are the few I think of.
From Literacy to Post Secondary: Keeping Students on their Career Paths
Alison + Owen.
So let’s have a look at events leading up to the ‘Bradford Spring’, let’s have a look at the kind of campaign Galloway fought; let’s, in the process, have a closer look at his character. So far as he has any faith at all I understand that he is Catholic by upbringing. Oh, no he is not; he is a Muslim, or so he hinted to the Bradford masses. At a campaign rally held on the weekend just prior to the poll he said;
Then there's the curse. You see, last week, I did something that I haven't done since I launched Damask Love...I went through my whole blog. All I have to say is YIKES! There are some doozies buried in there. As I looked through the projects of the past, I was a little embarrassed by some of the things I've posted. It's nice to see how my style has changed and developed over time and how I've grown as a papercrafter. Even with that said - there are a few cards in the archives that need to be laid to rest.
Our Cardz TV Design Team is having a Blog Hop on Saturday February 11th and Sunday February 12th! I hope you join us for some awesome projects that are sure to inspire you. What would a Blog Hop be without blog candy! So don't forget to come back on Saturday!
What’s so different about Tocco Tenero you would ask?
Over the past few months I’ve talked about body, soul, and spirit. The gift of holy spirit is given to us when we believe Romans 10:9-10. But before that, does a person have a logical mind? What about a heart? Yes. By logical deduction, these two things are of the body and soul, or as the Bible calls them the “natural man.” There are many words in the Greek for thinking, thoughts, reasoning and calculating and using this orb of understanding between our ears. But today I’d like to contrast two complete opposites states of the mind. One is the mental fortress or a strong hold, and the other is the wind-blown beach.
I've been doing the sock bun for a long time now, and it used to be that you were embarrassed to admit that you had footwear in your hair. It was like showing your knickers or your slip - a lady never does that. Now it's become a source of blogging pride to show exact details of this, frankly, lazy ass hairdo. It's actually really amusing to me. *p.s. if you want a tutorial just google it, there are literally dozens of them and I'm not adding to that pile* What's next? Do I show you how I use a hair elastic to keep my pants up?
poems ever made,
As hellish as my middle school years were, I feel very lucky that I was bullied before the digital age and I hope my kids survive their adolescence unscathed. It seems like a lot more damage can be done with a video camera and a social networking site than a baseball bat.
Twines and Brads
Finally, when considering lethal force we are of course mindful that there are important checks on our ability to act unilaterally in foreign territories. We do not use force whenever we want, wherever we want. International legal principles, including respect for a state’s sovereignty and the laws of war, impose constraints. The United States of America respects national sovereignty and international law.
Let's move on to Bogart's missus, the woman on the left, Lauren Bacall. Now nearing 90, she's often seen as one of the last living links to that Golden Age. After a strong start, however, her movie career basically sputtered. The strong start being the two movies she made with her future husband, To Have or Have Not and The Big Sleep. Though the inexperienced young thespian was more posing than acting in these films (she had started out as a model, after all) the camera nevertheless loved her, and she became a huge star before she really had a chance to hone her craft. A little later she also appeared with Bogie in Key Largo, another big hit. Then the sputtering began. She reportedly began turning down scripts she found of little interest, and the studios then started losing interest in her. Oh, there were a few critically acclaimed films like Young Man With a Horn, and she was on the verge of another big hit, How to Marry a Millionaire, when this photo was taken, at that movie's very premiere, in fact. However, the devil was in the credits. Though she arguably played the main character, she was billed third behind the other two stars, the first billed of whom is to the right of Bogart. Now, none of this is a reflection on Bacall's acting, which greatly improved as her film career declined, and would improve further still when, a few years after her husband's death, she moved back to New York and became a mainstay of the Broadway stage.
draft. She was pure evil, one of the most evil forces in the book. I don’t know when my mind would have worked that out if I had not been running. Joyce Carol Oates had it right all along.
Great Rock Bight is a nature preserve on the west side of the island. It’s located down a long, windy, easy to miss dirt road and has a few paths to hike that meander through the woods and one that goes down to the beach. For those that don’t know, a “bight” is a curve in the seashore. Not quite a cove or harbor, but somewhat sheltered. Great Rock Bight is just that, a beachy area that is a little sheltered by cliffs and rocks.
We found out which companies were supplying components in that new tablet by looking under the hood.
Winona, a young successful singer has had a stressful year and needs some peace and quiet. She travels to her old hometown where her manager has rented a house for her. There is something about the house, it’s surely not what she expected. She drives into town for a drink where she meets her ex Rick and his friends. They’re joining her for hanging out in the house and strange things begin to happen. A mysterious villain is on the loose.
ST. CATHARINES, ONT. – Doris Rosado watches her teenage daughters, Ninette and Kiara Mongrut, get the numbers “666” tattooed on their wrists, beaming with pride. The number typically conjures up biblical symbolism tied to the Antichrist, but this St. Catharines, Ont., family belongs to a obscure Christian sect for which “666” is a positive symbol of their group’s messianic leader.
The river’s all too swell, the spills they stay the ponds,
Don’t follow the crowd. Take advantage of the current values in these companies and actually wind up being one of those people who is at least smiling on the way to the bank.
There are looooads of projects in this book I want to try. They all use eco-friendly or recycled materials...I particularly like the sock babies, coiled fabric baskets, owl clothes peg holder, woven crisp bag bag, cd clock and candle mugs. This book also has yummy recipes and eco-tips for each season too!
James - 202
Take a peek at the other cards made by everyone and get some great inspiration!
But even in Oak Park, on balmy mornings like today, my spirit is refreshed. My heart soars, hitchhiking on the wings of songbirds. Every living creature knows there is balm in the air this morning. May your world be balmy today…
This does not mean that one has to get ghetto loud and obnoxious and tell someone “STOP FLIRTING WITH ME YOU DUMB MOFO OR YOU DUMB BIATCH! DON’T YOU SEE MY WIFE/HUSBAND/GIRLFRIEND/BOYFRIEND IS STANDING RIGHT HERE!?”
Still, as they say you can’t push a stalled Jaguar up a hill, although, to be fair this does tend to apply to most of the big cats, tigers in particular, who – as many naturalists will attest have a noticeable antipathy to any perceived incline.
The Saudi Olympic Committee president Prince Nawaf bin Faisal said he was “not endorsing” female participation in London as part of the official delegation.
All of these activities are free and everyone is welcome to come and join in, however we do ask that children under 8 are accompanied by an adult.
Having decided to descend from the Ivory Tower for a few days' revelry, I'm off to the Bay tomorrow for hijinks and low comedy (in that order).
Pop and Rock Artist Skye Delamey is our guestr tonight!
1. Wherever you are, if you can, stop what you are doing and take three long, slow, deep breaths, inhaling through your mouth and exhaling through your nose (according to my Reiki Master Teacher, breathing in this manner stimulates and activates the Chakras, the Energy Centers of the Body).
Fans will hear from their favorite stylists and stars as they share their personal red carpet inspirations, predictions, and inside secrets on how to achieve that special “award-winning” look.
Cooper Road trail runs from Abrams Creek out to Cades Cove. On this day we planned to just to a little chunk from Abrams Creek up to the junction with Gold Mine Trail at Cane Gap. I had done the first mile (up to the junction with Little Bottoms trail & campsite #1) several times before but had never been beyond campsite #1.
Local Environmental Plans (LEPs) are one form of “environmental planning instrument” (EPI) made under the Environment of Planning and Assessment Act 1979 (the Act). They are an “instrument” as defined by the Interpretation Act 1987 and they have the operation and effect of legislation.
- 4PM Goblin "Fuckin" Cock who is going to "Fucking rock our world!" (Say in devil voice, but sing it in Ozzy voice). These guys showed up looking like alternative rockers, changed into matching "Goblin Cock Crew" uniforms (kind of looking like hayseed fed-ex guys), started a dry ice machine, then came marching out in Grim reaper robes with satin face covering. I think they took their Black Sabbath fetish too far. The music was definitely spooky, but not as bad as you're probably thinking....and the FREE BEER Showed up..."A Whoo Hoo!"
~ glamorous straw hats ~
This book is sure to appeal to anyone with a healthy curiosity about sex, and serve as a guilty diversion for everyone else. Equally awe-inspiring and side-splitting, it marks another high point in Ms. Roach’s already stellar career. Best of all, you won’t look creepy reading it on the bus.
The engineer had 0.375 calibre Manlicher rifle. He also gave Shankar a rifle. Two of them slowly came out of the tent. They saw the hole. But where is the lion? Shankar pointed towards the hole: It was over there sahib, see that hole there?
Any thoughts? Ideas? Suggestions?
NEXT MOVIE: Darkman (1990)
2. What can I make with the yarn that I have on hand.
Maybe The Iguanas are still sitting at the bar, waiting for a dawn, champagne and strawberries…
Then it hit me.
last name, richly perplexedly Gaelic
Rather than focus on the negative I choose to focus on these photos from the past.
Clouds shrouded the Guanacaste skies for several days prior to the Solstice Eclipse. Surely the drizzle would cease, and the skies would clear?
The interior of the restaurant is simple with a few tables at the porch area for smokers, and 2 indoor dining area. There are approximately 10 tables in total if I’m not mistaken. I did some research while I was inside the restaurant and found out that during the day, they sell Thai Economy Rice (I assume it is specially to cater to working professionals and their lunch time) and they serve ala carte menu during
And no better sister than you!
Two-row (US) 2.000lb Grain 11.1%
New Tape
bar is highlighted by a rustic wood beam ceiling, exposed brick walls
And now the tree is up where the chair and table were:) If you'd like to look at last year's stairs, you can go HERE.
The film’s politics irked me most of all. Odin is the all-knowing patriarch, who kindly looks over his subjects with a wise distance. He runs what is, essentially, a benevolent empire. He rules for life until one of his sons takes over. In this way he’s like Saddam, Qaddafi, Idi Amin, the House of Saud, every petty and vengeful dictator since the dawn of time. Over an eternity, wouldn’t Odin eventually grow bored? Wouldn’t he at least experiment with sadism, hedonism, recklessness? (The myths often have him doing exactly this.) What makes him so good?
“Someone please fuck me.” Her voice was strained, and she wondered how much time she had left. Jasper stepped up. “As you wish m’lady” he whispered, sliding his prick into her dripping cunt. He moved tenderly at first, at an angle. His head rubbed her g-spot just perfectly. She gazed into his bright eyes, her mouth still working James' prick. She clenched around him, coming hard.
and this really has to be the word of the year
Papers and chipboard star - K & Co.
Bx
It is time to reacquaint myself with my center. It is time for a walk in the woods, whether they come to me or I go to them, so I may discard the noise of the world and hear my own voice again.
All pictures posted with permission of Edith Gybels.
Thanks for reading this far!
Three cheers for the sneaky bastards at the New York Times IT department.
Angie has been wearing Bashful Blush, a versatile "your lips but better" shade. This is the perfect color for anyone who wants a muted, slightly brownish pink for daytime wear. It goes on with just the right amount of pigment and a subtle sheen, right out of the tube. It looks especially beautiful with Angie’s coloring: she is a pale brunette with blue-gray eyes.
The 1st installation we saw was titled "AWAKENING" and was unanimously interpreted as having spiritual connotations. The upsweep of the white drapes, the quiet and the grace of this installation clearly gave the feeling of ascension and hope with its multi leveled and layered silhouettes of flying birds.
Did Monsanto actually plant genetically modified alfalfa before it was deregulated by the USDA? There is some shocking evidence that, until recently, was withheld from the public showing that Monsanto’s genetically altered alfalfa may have been set free in 2003 — a full two years or more before it was deregulated in 2005. In a letter, obtained by NaturalSociety with permission to post for public viewing, it becomes clear that the USDA may have turned a blind eye to the entire situation, allowing widespread GMO contamination of GMO-free crops.
And favorite character? Yeah, it's Iriya Tetsuo. Not just because he's a hottie, though that doesn't hurt, but because it's easiest for me to identify with his struggles. While everyone's trying to find their place, he does the best, I think, at keeping his feet on the ground despite the fact his role is the hardest. And he never turns his back on the people he cares about.
1 cup frozen whole-kernel corn
I mentioned breifly that I wanted to find a volunteer outlet somewhere in the city where I could constuctively invest my newfound free time. I went researching and por casualidad found an organization called Food For Life that operates all around the world and has a branch here in Buenos Aires. They are a free food distribution group that hands out all vegan/vegetarian/organic food. Now I know what you're thinking! Why would poor hungry people needing to be fed care about the ethical quality of food that is put on their plate?? Well, let me tell you about the adventure that led me to the answer!
“A 14-year-old girl from Waterville has convinced more than 7,000 people to sign her online petition aimed at convincing Seventeen Magazine to do more to promote positive body images among its young readers.”
Enjoy your week!
If you just happen to be stopping by my blog today, be sure to start over at the I Am Roses Challenge blog so you don't miss out!" The challenge blog is located here: www.iamroses-challenge.blogspot.com
On almost nothing, and with no one
I am the way, the truth, and the life Jn. 14:6
Shankar turned to his side — this is where Tirumal was sitting. Where was he? May be he had gone to sleep in his own tent.
singer: You don’t say.
Grandma Got Run Over By a Reindeer ... Cartoon Network (west) ... 2 PM
Commentary by Lee Yeon-ho (film critic) and Kim Dae-seung (director, Blood Rain)
I have some quibbles. I might have made the master bedroom ten feet longer, but I understand the architect’s idea, I think, which is that the bedroom should be a protective space, not an airplane hangar, and besides, there’s a huge sitting room if you insist on space. The land itself, while beautifully landscaped, backs up to those two failed spec houses which were carved out of this property and built on S. Baldwin Farms. Eventually they will be finished and occupied or torn down, I suppose, but until then, you have a question mark as a neighbor.
I was very, very amused. But, you know, they didn't go to school to study geography; it was probably unimportant in light of all the medical knowledge they had crammed into their brains. They were absolutely awesome doctors. They did know what they were doing. They got Hubby on the right medications (it took two tries--the first med they gave him made him not be able to hear). However, he had developed pneumonia, so we were in the hospital for a week because of the malaria and pneumonia. I spent numerous hours sitting in the dark hospital room (since Hubby couldn't stand the light), writing and chatting on AIM and staying sane. I ran back and forth between the hospital and apartment to shower/pick things up. It was quite a honeymoon. :p
629. Senor Jim’s Fresh Strawberries @ Tiki Bar (Spring Mount, PA) 2:52 p.m.
told the News Agency of Nigeria
I set my oven timer for 10 minutes, slid my first batch in, and held my breath. The moment of truth, I've heard, comes at about 5 minutes in the oven. At that point, your macarons should just start developing their "feet," that little shelf they stand on once they're baked. They rise just so, and their feet form underneath them, and they begin to look just as they should. And when I checked mine, lo and behold, the feet were there! I was very ecstatic at that point, but I knew they weren't finished baking and I didn't want to count my chickens (my macarons) before they were hatched (...or baked?).
My LOVE of my life (dear daughter) tripped and hit her eye tonight on a table and has a SHINER like you wouldn't believe.
In other news, I got a new cell phone! So I can now text (bid news for some of you, I know!) and I do have a Canada plan (calling is 10c a min, which is better than th 49c a min I had without a plan). So - let me know if you want my number!
“The situation is incredibly delicate,” said Huerta, the government anthropologist.
The longest book of the Bible is Psalms with 150 chapters, or psalms. It contains 43,743 words. The shortest book is 3 John with only 1 chapter and 299 words.
Yeah, I would totally have called this a milk stout in a blind tasting. Very smooth and slightly sweet feel and taste. Plenty of roasted grain taste that every stout should have as well, but slightly silky like lactose does.
Then you are probably making conscious decisions about your life."
3.My husband’s death(crazy,I don’t even know him!)
It is an easy task to make any witness uncomfortable. Any of us could do this. If we were questioning an honorable physician, politician, businessman or priest, we could change the subject matter and ask insinuating questions that no ordinary and decent individual would welcome.
The Website Builder is a template driven Website Designs Australia and this enables non-technical users to create a website easily and professionally. The template driven web design from content makes it possible to edit content without affecting the design or format of your website. One can keep the website content up to date without needing to have special knowledge about HTML or other Web technologies.
We cross a busy road onto Wimbledon Common, but the traffic noise soon subsides as we head beneath the dappled shade of oak and birch woodland, broken only by patches of heather-covered heathland. Like the Park, Wimbledon Common is somewhere I visited often as child, and an early memory of being told off for climbing a tree by a smartly-uniformed mounted Keeper, and thinking ‘wow! what a great job!’ may have been the earliest stimulus for a later career in conservation and landscape management. So, thank you Wimbledon Common; sorry about the tree.
Back to Rumble Tumble….
I lost my camera cord for 2 months. Consequently, I didn't post anything because let's face it-little I say is interesting without a picture. So here I am back tracking!
Goddess: “Crescent one of the starry skies / Flowered one of the fertile plain / Flowing one of the ocean’s sighs / Blessed one of the gentle rain / Hear my chant amidst the standing stones / Open us to your mystic light / Waken us to your silver tones / Be with us in this sacred rite!”
10 - Fall Of The Peacemakers 08:08
I love Momofuku's over-the-top ingredients and butter content. I love the chocolate quotient from Jacques Torres and Petrossian. But the size, weight, cakiness, chewiness, and ratio of batter to chips is sheer perfection. These were still warm when I picked them up. It just doesn't get much better. Three bellies can't be wrong.
Recipe Name: Fruit Chaat
and how long it takes for certain veggies to mature.
Makes 1 cocktail
Particularly challenging are micing live acoustic instruments, like acoustic pianos, and getting enough volume without feedback in a full band environment. I must admit that I was initially skeptical that the mics would either pick up too much and be unusable or that they would distort or clip due to high sound pressure levels. I was surprised to find that we were able to achieve both great sound quality and volume from DPA’s SMK4061 stereo mic kit with no clipping or distorting.
Once the walnuts have done their briney stint for a couple of weeks, drain them and spread them out onto a tray lined with absorbent paper and leave for a couple of days to dry out. They will turn black. This is normal. They will also stain anything they come into contact with. Including your hands - in fact you will look as though you have been on a 100 a day nicotine addiction for the last 10 years if you handle them without gloves.
news of new releases and fun projects.
and decide to go hit the clearance sections at Target, Old Navy and TJ
Sweet pea, I know just how you feel.
Finishing the last stitches on the binding as the sun sets and the wind grows more chilly...
3. I Can't Get Next To You—Temptations
That just about covers this review! Take some time to read through all these articles and watch some videos today to review all these ideas about free motion quilting.
while Barry was the definition where men got he word pig from
We know how exciting and confusing the walk can be for new dogs. We ask prospective members to attend their first walk without their dogs to allow them to understand the structure, ask questions, and observe the group so when they do come with their dog they already have a sense of the group.
While visiting I was able to snap pictures of a few of the ‘guests’ who visited their backyard. Hungry visitors!
The new Jannat 2, sequel of 2008 hit ‘Jannat’ will soon hit the screens in the month of May. Emraan Khan Starrer film will be released on May 4, 2012. Randeep Hooda Imran Zahid and Esha Gupta will support Emraan in the lead roles. The story is based on the issue of illegal arms in Delhi.
Muhyiddin said the novel would be used nationwide only after the amendments had been made and pending that, the Education Ministry would direct teachers to continue teaching the subject using the existing syllabus. “I believe we have enough time to make the detailed amendments so that there will not be any more disputes over the novel.” Muhyiddin said the decision was made after taking into account the views of various parties that Interlok was a good novel to nurture and strengthen unity among the multireligious and multicultural population in Malaysia.
I loved this yarn - it feels so nice! The color combination is really interesting - I like the way it blends warm earth tones with some pops of brighter color.
Food for Lower Cholesterol
Now, given that there are 27,100,000 songs featuring those lyrics, most of which are above love & heartache & love and other sentimental crap, I had a choice to go the Super-Mushy-Gushy route or the Slightly-Less-Mushy-Gushy route.
he roars on command.
This game is not so much an emulation as a carefully researched exposition of the nascent form of “the world's most popular role-playing game.” With Dragons at Dawn, D. H. Boggs displayed his comprehension of – and his reverence for – the origins of the hobby. Champions of ZED promises to be a game loyal to its roots as well as a work of fulsome scholarship.
Hot on the heels of the library cuts debate came to threat to cut the government subsidy to three Booktrust bookgifting schemes: Bookstart, Booktime and Booked Up. This is spite of the fact that Booktrust generates £56m against the £13m given to them.
Twelve homes
Don't tell anyone ... but I may even have to leave the country for a short spell.
Something changed in me.
When you see a domestic violence survivor, they wear their purple with pride.
Out of the blue yesterday, both the EU and the Irish government cahooted together and decided, “Naw, we’re not goin’ to let ye cut yeer turf.”*
Writing had been, always was, what I was aiming for all my life.
Ok, another scenario, let’s say a potential client is going through your design porfolio, and sees these tutorials and start thinking,
mtscrapgal said...
However, when the population of the country reaches 150,000,000 or 200,000,000 then labor will likely be as plentiful here as it is now in Europe. Then, the labor of the Negro will hardly be solicited, rather otherwise. The white man's sympathetic attitude toward the Negroes' many shortcomings is fast passing. When the Negro is required to measure up to the white man's standard and is found wanting, what remains for him?
So it’s Valentine’s Day, and whether or not you have someone to celebrate with, you can help me celebrate my one year anniversary with one of my clients, Kasie West (isn’t Kasie hot?? But check her out and then make sure you come back because I have a lot more to say).
I used to call in to the local radio station and win tickets to stuff back when I had a job where I could listen to the radio and could set work’s speed dial. I got pretty good at it… one day I won tickets to Jethro Tull along with backstage passes to meet the band before the show. It was for their Rock Island tour, an album that they seemed to do in response to the controversy over them winning the newly created Grammy Award for Best Hard Rock/Metal Performance Vocal or Instrumental, beating out Metallica. Rock Island was really, really heavy. Anyway, I took a friend of mine who was a Jethro Tull fanatic with me to meet the band, with the only stipulation that he give me a record to bring for them to sign, since I actually didn’t own any Jethro Tull. Mike had an extra copy of Stand Up, which was old enough and rare enough I suppose for the band to think I was a super-fan, and they ended up picking me to go up on stage with them and play air guitar with a tennis racket alongside the guitarist on one of his blazing guitar solos. I mean, yeah it was scary as hell to get up on stage at the Richmond Coliseum and do that, but are you going to say no?
Crime was a crime no matter who
AC: Who pays?
Why are there so many adoptable children?
I never liked Urban Outfitters much when my now 25 year old was 13. Thought the clothes were crummy and prices high. I liked the shattered glass and tenement-like feel of the place for about 5 minutes, and then it felt old real fast.
A. I have only seen black bears and I do not talk of what I have not seen.
So I sat with Miss Faith today & we accomplished two completed projects: Harry Potter skirt & T-shirt scarf from unschooling conference shirts :)
Sketches, notes, brainstorms and any ideas on paper will be scanned and placed on the blog to show the development of this project, I will also be evaluating my own work, mentioning were improvements could be made and giving my feedback on using the software at hand.
Ellora’s Cave has received much-appreciated attention and support from Joyce Lamb’s HEA blog on the USA Today site. Please do check out the blog and the many book reviews, and leave comments if you are so inclined. I hope the USA Today organization sees that a blog about romance novels is appreciated and popular, and gives the genre the respect and attention it deserves.
Let them identify you to the future in these songs.
But oh I’m afraid, afraid.
I blared Hip Hop Hurray
The possibility of unilateral divorce.
I was most excited for Emcee Me and DJ Spinner since I hoard yellows and greens for Duck Day manicures. I was a little disappointed with Emcee Me because it was more of a green based yellow. My assumption was that it might be brighter just by judging the sticker on the bottle. Of course, once I went to apply it I could tell that it was a very deep seaweed green in bottle. Thus, the end result makes sense but I still long for a lemony yellow.
I rode a nice elephant.
Get comfortable with shedding your past lives and evolving into new ones.
If you'd like to know more or sign up for the Cooperative, click here and check it out.
Callie Andrews may not have money or connections or the right clothes, and she may have way too many complications in her love life, what with
The smaller glass doors were salvaged
But there is no water
Margaret L. Benson, 52, Rockaway, N.J.
I am also thinking of rocking the flower in the hair look on the regular. Specifically at innapropriate times. Like the next big blizzard in D.C. you'll just see me cruising about with a hibiscus tucked behind my ear. Flowers in the hair is the Hawaiian tiara. I am an equal opportunity tiara employer.
Sometimes, even on our own., playing games is fun;
Some people will disagree, but this is what i experienced, most of the time, as a player or GM.
DIAGNOSES (Other):
Azalea may not realize how tangled she is in his web until it is too late.
Bring the milk to an almost boil, drop in the butter, cool to room tempurature and add in the tsp of orange flower water. In a mixer combine the flour, salt, yeast, spices, sugar and anise seed. Add the milk mixture & the egg and mix on low for 4 minutes, then on med for about 6 minutes. The dough will be sticky. Turn it out onto a floured surface and flatten the dough and add the fruits & zest and knead until it is well combined. You will want to add flour if necessary to stop it from sticking. Put in a greased bowl and proof for an hour or until doubled in size. I forgot to take a picture of this stage, sorry. Punch down the dough and divide into 24 pieces, shape into rounds & proof again for about an hour. (The amount you make depends on how large you want the buns to be, but remember they will grow a bit).
With the life-long love of comrades.
Barbecue in the distance.
So privileged to call them Mama Jack and Papa Jack.
Price: $18.00
Row 7: Knit 4 stitches, purl into the back of the middle stitch, knit 4 stitches.
In the beginning of the year, the OTHER Rebecca was giving bibliomancy readings on FB the old-fashioned way, using physical books from her library. Mine was:
Top 10 aka #1-10 (boys: 7, girls: 4)
Duh!
I mean, haven’t the Mets learned that getting the poor-man’s version of anything just doesn’t work?? I mean, Jason Bay – poor-man’s version of Matt Holliday. Oliver Perez – poor man’s version of Derek Lowe (though honestly, Perez is a very rich man because of Omar Minaya).
I seem to remember spending hours outside in the snow with my brother. Now I realize that we were probably only out there long enough for my mom to retreat to the bedroom, smack herself with a pillow three times and then regroup in time to make us hot chocolate. And then we probably had a fistfight over who got more marshmallows.
How do you manage FB time versus other social media time spent?
Today I have a card to share that I created with the May SOE kit!
Also, due to my being delayed a bit, I was able to see this awesome sunset on the drive home!
Excuse me, but aren't sharks (besides not being heavy breathers) also supposed to be in perpetual motion or else they'll die? I think I heard that in school once. Seems René or Ramón or Christina didn't take that class. Otherwise, el Bruce del Tiburón wouldn't be staying off to one side, lurking in wait while those stupid fleshy humans splash around in his water. Thinking, "soon"....
This was supposed to go up last week but I somehow forgot to save it correctly....
The sketch is from Sketch Saturday but when I went to link to the sketch, it's not there. I just saved it to my computer in the last day or so, so now I am wondering if it is an upcoming one that snuck into post mode before it was supposed to. Anyway, I used it to make my card for today, so I am still sharing it:-)
“Addison.” Addison was still very nervous, now biting on her fingernail because the urge not to was too strong.
From what do false religions arise? Today we are looking at Acts 22:18 as the apostle Paul continues his testimony before the great crowd of Jews in Jerusalem.
I've realised this home management binder thing just hasn't been working for me! I really don't check it daily, I feel as though I have no reason to honestly, and for me it becomes just another place to store more paper than I do already!
medium air blowing
Late at night, when a hush falls over the city and the moon rises high in the sky, a throaty howling screech pierces the calm. Ripping, shredding, gnawing noises cause people to wake from their sleep, cats to arch and hiss, and the sirens of the police start blaring.
To Occupy: you squat in city park
Yours in trying to figure it out,
ARE YOU INSPIRED TO MAKE MIXED MEDIA?
What a beautiful Pussy you are!"
A few weeks back, my little girl ran and jumped in the middle of our bed very early in the morning. She said it was too cold in her room to stay alone in bed.
“To be fair, it should have come into force much earlier. Why all of a sudden it was rushed?” she asked.
I also believe that about prayer. We've learned to start and end each day by praying for each other. I never EVER feel safer in my marriage then when Neal is praying for me.
Furthermore, the possible introduction of a lateral hire can usefully test the viability and purity of the firm’s compensation system. If the system is quirky, inexplicable, over-complex or thoroughly outdated, it is unlikely to be attractive to a new joiner.
It's a musical week here in the studio! This necklace features a copper bird from Lipstick Ranch, and some resin teardrop focals from Jade Scott. Wanted to do something unique with these components- So I flipped them upside down, and attached some chain and wire wrapped garnets.
Fragranced air tickles darkness,
I picked up some hats and noisemakers.
This cake absolutely hit the spot. It has a lovely lemon-y taste from the lemon zest in the cake and the lemon juice the the syrup drizzled over the top. The sour cream gives it a nice little tang-y kick. And the poppy seeds.....they're so pretty (although the recipe did pretty much use up my whole jar of them).
COST: £750 (full), £700 (ASF-UK members) Includes accommodation, breakfasts and lunches, course fee, pickup from Leh airport, and organised travel within Ladakh
Today has been a strange day. A mixed bag. A very respected colleague and friend of mine has decided, for very good reasons, that it is time to give time to her own writing and close her feathered wings to the many writers who have taken shelter under them previously. In the past couple of years, I have been supported, chastised, encouraged and generally made into a better writer by this powerhouse of a woman. She is blunt, original, unafraid of grinding toes into grit, egos to reality – if it gets the job done. It’s all about the writing: the nuance of story, the solidity of character, poetry on a page even in prose.
This lead me to see if there were any better songs that were #1 hits on my birthday. There have been a few good ones, but most of them are sadly lacking. If you care to see them go here. Looking over this list I have realized that I am truly stuck in the late 80s and early 90s. As I saw each song, I heard them in my mind and could visualize where I was when I heard this. For example in 1989 Michael Damien (of Young and the Restless fame, remember Danny Romalatti), did a remake of the classic Rock On. I can still see myself raking the grass in the my grandparent's front lawn and listening to this song on a hot summer day.
ANTON BRUCKNER
Turner and McGoldrick have already spent four months held without charge in a notorious prison in Hungary after being handed over by the UK government in 2009. The pair were later released and allowed to return to Britain but now have to go back to face a fraud trial, over an issue which, in the UK, would usually be dealt with as a civil case.
ok, here is the bad news:
These next two prints are the same photography. I printed it twice as I felt one of the prints was too dark. The first print really captures the model in the photograph and shows all detail on her clothes, however something happened to exposure on the photographic paper creating lines across the image. The second print was darker, showing the detail in the clouds and sky, landscape etc, however darkening the model. I think I prefer the lighter print as my model in the image has a weird ghostly glow on her from the double exposed photographs.
So on the one hand, I have been sick for a month. This week has been the WORST. It has morphed from a run-of-the-mill cold to to full-blown yuckiness throughout my respiratory system. I won't go into the gory details, but, BLECH! It also seems like every teacher in the building is rotating in and out of being sick. I think on some days this week there were more subs than teachers and that has been majorly un-fun.
Oh no sir-ee! This lass couldn't pop online and purchase said doll from some gorgeous and super experienced doll making soul from etsy or other land of crafty goodness.Oh no no no! I like to torture myself with endeavours that will no doubt illicit a cacophony of very colourful language before the end. Me Own Serf!!!
234....9 and retrograde, then 34....43.
Ahem Ahem….So Thanks to the magnificent Lill and Jill, (awww I am still so touched…sob! sob!!Thank you Guys!) I have been nominated for the Sunshine Award. I would like to take these 15 seconds of fame and Thank my Father/Mother/dog/cat/neighbour/fellow students at my University from Slovakia and Turkmenistan…..No I have not really lost it (yet!) and I am not really doing this, so please do not drop your jaws or start reading another blog!!!
Beyond a wholesome discipline,
To satisy the puritains Spartan says he’ll marry Gail in the interests of science. What woman could resist an offer like that? Gail. She decides to do the sham marriage bit with Bill Drake. Spartan is in a rage and swears he’ll get revenge. The ceremony is performed an hour before take off with lots of press.
A Nigerian Air Force F7-Ni single seat fighter jet, on a routine training exercise, crashed on Wednesday close to the Kaduna International Airport.
Begin today and take it to a higher vibration, my friend. As you create a means to higher vibrations your life will take an amazing change. Solutions will come easier, calm will overtake your experiences, and an easy steady flow begins.
12 olives
I'm not a fan.
#7. I love eating fast food, I go out eating burguers or hot dogs at least once a week, but a couple of months ago, I started eating a bit healthier.
and se-e the jin-gle dancers and
There are many reasons that garments may morph between the design sample stage to production. In this case the original fabric may have become unavailable due to unforeseen supply issues but I often wonder with High Street fashion chains if it is just a cynical cost cutting exercise in the mad dash for profits by replacing good raw materials with inferior cheaper ones. At any rate, even if the sample that went to press was the intended final product, it smacks of false advertising when something else altogether goes on sale.
Anyhow, this season has opened my eyes to many things. The most important realization I’ve had: I will never be The Bachelorette.
For this formula, you must remember that diameter is measured in feet, not inches. The conversion for gallons was added at the end of the volume formula so that we are not left with an answer in cubic feet, but instead will have an answer measured in gallons. This is a way to help you from forgetting to convert your answer.
As I type this I'm listening to Rush. Not Rush the conservative moron. Rush the band.
OK, the blog candy for today, yesterday and the day before lol !!! Yeah , three blog candys today..... we have one set each, of all three new paper collections up for grabs, how great is that, three chances in one ! And there are still more goodies to come over the next few days :)
Thanks to what will be seen as a historic gaffe by Vice President Joe Biden, the President was put in a vice as he was seen to vacillate—evolve—his position regarding gay marriage, but elections often turn on such issues. Yes, the economy will be the dominant issue of the 2012 election, but the President found himself in a position where he could not avoid taking a position. It was diametrically different from the one he expressed in the 2008 campaign.
So why should not we just dismiss all the doubts?
Beyonces father, Matthew Knowles, acting as her manager is known for his aggressive man handling and setting her up with music rights. He wanted to make sure that he got Beyonces name on the list as a writer. Problem is, she didn’t write these songs. There are many more songs and works that were published and copyrighted that the Knowles family stole. They are powerhouses in the business, and also bullies.
Why It’s Working: People can bring themselves out of poverty with access to safe drinking water, a secure food supply, vaccinations from diseases, home and office lighting, and computers — all enabled by the sustainable energy solutions SELF implements.
We've all heard that cucumbers are good for the eyes, but did you know that potatoes are even better? Plus, you are more likely to have them sitting in your cupboard somewhere.
When will the PM show some leadership qualities? When confronted with difficult questions he mumbles “No comment”. At a private function at the Royal Selangor Club, it is alleged that he was asked if he would willingly transfer power to the opposition, should he lose GE13. He was non-committal, before walking out in a huff. Last week, the same thing occurred and he cut short a press conference when asked if he would testify at the Scorpene inquiry in Paris.
But I must…
One of my favorite things about LA is the selection of independent boutiques. I LOVE shopping on Main St. and also Montana Ave. in Santa Monica. Melrose (Ave.) is great also. Planet Blue is a must if you're in town.
WEINGARTEN S, STANILOFF H, AULT M, MILES P, BAMBERGER M, MEYER RD. Do hospital employees benefit from the influenza vaccine? A placebo-controlled clinical trial. J Gen Int Med 1988; 3: 32-37.
And time is what I've been given. Lots of time. Four weeks ago, my father-in-law came to me and gave me the offer of a lifetime (so far, at least): take 6 months off, on him. Enjoy the boys, rest, relax, figure out what my next step is. He told me several things that I'd like to remember.
Second, I’ve created a starker and cleaner contrast of colors. The black bar rests below a defined white space and sits just above a cool red. In this way, the viewer’s eye is drawn down, towards the title of the work that rests in the bottom 1/3 of the cover. No longer are sage greens and browns competing with yellow and silver text; rather, the color palate is simplified and made starker. The eye knows where it is to go, now: to the book’s title and the author’s name. Finally, I’ve added a subtitle to the text: “a novel of instruction.”
What you doing on your back?
writes fiction and nonfiction for children and adults. Her children’s picture books include Crash, The Magic Violin, Humberto, the Bookworm Hamster, Frederico, the Mouse Violinist, The Doll Violinist, The Water Cycle: Water Play Series Book I and the upcoming The Fox in the Night. She’s had over 300 reviews, articles, stories and interviews published online and in print. She’s
Remember - the annual hockey reunion is on for this Sunday, October 16th at 9 am. We don't have a lot of feedback from folks so I hope you all will make an effort to be there and capture a little past glory. If you skated at Ave F in the 70s (and even 1980) you are who we are talking to. Of course, we'll take any warm body, but this is really geared toward you old timers in your late 40s through 50s (and you know who you are).
What the Trades Unions do constitute, however, is precisely what Marx says here, “organising centres”. The bourgeoisie, as its economic power developed, within the towns, used those towns as its organising centres. It was via, Coffee Houses, Business Clubs and whatever that groups of bourgeois could come together, and discuss their common interests, develop strategy etc. and begin to develop the political forms, which met their particular needs, the development of their Political Party, the development of Municipal Government etc. The Liberal Party did not simply emerge as the political party of the bourgeoisie, but was the product of these discussions, and conscious organisation. The same is true of Municipal Government. The only similar forums for workers were the Trades Unions. The Trades Unions were not an end in themselves, therefore, but an effective means by which the workers could begin to develop the ideas, and begin to create the kinds of organisations under which the material conditions which led to the competition between them could be changed. Trades Unions in themselves could never achieve that, and so could not be the basis of creating a new society.
1084. – The Supplier Dinner @ Mundy’s House –
Design Analysis
Always Shine On!
Please note that any advertisements that you see on this blog are placed here by WordPress.com. The Administrators of this blog have no connection to or financial interest in any of the promoted products and/or services and gain no income from any advertising displayed on this blog. Please do not click on any promotions that you do not wish to support.
Things are going really well. I LOVE it here. Living in the city is a huge change, but a very welcome one. I don't miss my car at all and the only thing I miss about Portsmouth is my dog.
Cough, cough cough, cough cough cough.
The little doodles match nearly perfectly with these- the "Snapshot" one may be a bit of a stretch, but we compare it to "Gather Ideas" on our Writing Process and ideas being stars that we choose and zoom in on during writing.
Ale glass (Sierra Nevada Anniversary Ale commemorative).
In other sequences, such as a vision where gravity shifts and we see both dancers as if they are seated at a table from above, they become a couple, negotiating the differences and contradictions of relationship. But mostly this is an exploration of the ways in which human beings deal with and express their interior polarities.
To compensate the beers are available in as many as six different glasses: in addition to Bolleke, there is a choice of a Bol, a Prinske, a Prinses, a Fluit and a Handje. Given a choice, I would rather see more brews and fewer glasses.
That’s it????
Jane, now also having discovered the aged newspaper that crammed the draft-holes in the walls, was attempting to flatten out a large torn portion of a strip of newspaper that announced the destruction of the Hindenburg in Lakehurst in 1937. She called me over and we stood there marveling at it. I was mid-sentence, decrying the use of such a historical headline as hole-fodder, when we heard the thump overhead. In retrospect I wish we'd had a video- camera to record my reaction to this sound, because I nearly jumped out of my skin and my motions, although betrayed by my desire to remain cool in the situation, displayed a willingness to race headlong out the entryway of that place. But my legs and feet, loyal to my inner workings, took only a single step before falling into compliance.
But things did not always ring true, observable anomalies were inexplicable if all men are the same.
Karna was keen to acquire the Brahmastra mantra from the great teacher Parshuram. However, he knew that Parshuram gave instructions to Brahmins (the priestly tribe) only (call it elitism in education system). So he disguised as a Brahmin and beseeched Parshuram to accept him as a disciple. Parshuram accepted him as such and started giving him instructions.
The top attraction at Chappell's is thought to be the 1974 World Series trophy Finley's rough-and-tumble Oakland A's won against the Dodgers. There also are balls autographed by Babe Ruth, Ty Cobb and Dizzy Dean, as well as impressive collections of old jerseys, pennants and photographs.
I like this week's topic because I think too often we focus on what we don't like about ourselves and forget about what makes us beautiful, unique and special. I encourage everyone to think about why they are beautiful because we all are.
protection from a threat?
People from other countries and ethnic groups have no respect for our corrupted women who they see as only good for one thing. Many are raped every weekend and not know it or who by, as they usually cannot remember how they got home. Later, they might want an abortion or find they are HIV-Positive!
- bels, norfolk, 28/12/2010 16:30
This time there were no rules. The U.N. could take their rules of engagement and shove them where the sun doesn’t shine.
you may need to
One of the movies I wanted to see at the 2011 installment of ActionFest was some French actioner called LARGO WINCH. The description seemed cool and I dug the sound of the movie's pedigree – it's based on a series of novels I'd never heard of that later inspired an ongoing run of wildly popular comic books. That was all I knew but its showtimes conflicted with other entries higher on my list and we never got around to seeing it.
- 1/2 c. plain bread crumbs
DJ Krystoph starts at 6 p.m., and the store doesn’t close until 10, so it’s an all-day event. Many thanks to Stacy and the Organic Hippie staff for helping us out like this.
Upon reading the ending of the book where there is a Q&A with Laura, the main character, it made me think more about the following & what she said. She was asked if she had plans to write another book & she mentioned how great it would be to give other people a chance to share their "Invisible Thread" stories then compile all of those into one book. "They would all be stories of people that were destined to meet & the amazing confluence of events that had to happen for them to meet & how meeting each other changes their lives in profound ways. I think a lot of people out there have just such a person in their lives, and maybe they haven't really thought about their relationship as an "Invisible Thread" relationship, but maybe that's just what it is- this bond that never breaks, connecting them for a reason."
ps. Any tips or suggestions will be appreciated!!!
I am 33 weeks along and doing good. I have been feeling more tired and hungry lately. And larger! It's exciting to think our baby boy is going to be here soon. I can't wait for him to come!
I was fortunate enough to go to the Centenary Camp at Harewood House last year and met some fantastic people - yes they are in the phonebox!
Reflecting the fogginess that must exist within her simply because she can’t fathom it otherwise,
There was so much to love about this book that nothing I could write would be able to include all of the many things done right. The characters are wonderfully developed and I really enjoyed Brady's emotional journey. The townspeople and the vet clinic made for a delightful cast of supporting charactes and I'm so looking forward to Brady's “brothers” books.
While retaining the same engine and with the general evolutionary theme of the car, the roll hoop area is indistinguishable from the 2011 car. No doubt there are structural changes under the skin, but these aren’t visually apparent or announced by the team.
Devon challenged the one man we all want to see him beat, it is his own “brother”, Bully Ray.
-On 12.24.11 you celebrated your first Christmas Eve! You went to Papa's, MaJo and PaJack's, and Aunt Phyllis and Uncle Doug's. We opened gifts as a family of three that night! You were such a great baby...happy when you were awake...and slept through a lot of the commotion!
benadryl. (Harper had an allergic reaction today.)
Instantly going up,
But the years at Roadside were also filled with constant activity in causes both old & new. After the Thirteenth Amendment had abolished slavery, she could not agree with Garrison that there remained no further work for friends of the Negro. So she pressed for Negro suffrage & threw herself in the work of the Friends Association of Philadelphia for the Aid & Elevation of the Freedmen, which provided economic aid & established elementary schools for Negroes in the South. Higher education for the children of Friends occupied her too, & she busied herself in raising money for the Quaker college established at Swarthmore in 1864. Always a strong believe in the Quaker peace testimony, she regularly attended meetings of the Pennsylvania Peace Society, of which she was vice-president. She seldom missed a woman’s rights or suffrage convention & seldom failed to be called upon for an address. At the 1st convention of the American Equal Rights Association in 1866, she was named president at the insistence of Elizabeth Cady Stanton.
So, I guess my point here is that I am beginning to have a life again. A life, granted, without my former best friend, which is what prompted me to write today.
It's an enjoyable enough read but my enthusiasm for turning the pages towards the end came more from the prospect of finishing it rather than wanting to know how it finished. The book doesn't seem to have the fastidious construction I had expected from a Carey novel. As I said, one half of the book is much weaker than the second but it is also in the very obvious ways in which themes are linked between the various narrative strands that one starts to notice the machinery rather than the art. A little like looking at an unconvincing automaton. I suspect this is not one of his best books, or that if it is then Carey is probably not for me.
Condell’s Facebook status read: ” Kingdom in the closet.” Well, it is!
“The goal is not to sift the thousand things held to the light, but to drink them” – Mark Nepo
"Thanks." Simon smooths his blonde hair his face the picture of innocence.
Lynch also reports that several of the TV stations that Webb claims as potential markets for The WRITE Stuff deny having any arrangement with him. “We were only aware of the show because the network brought it to our attention, and I made sure we didn’t have it scheduled. If it were to come to our attention, we probably wouldn’t air it because we believe it’s produced without our approval,” says the Vice President of CW69 in Atlanta, Tom Canedo. As of this writing, however, that channel is still listed on Webb's website.
If you got Book Worm score would you please consult the post: “So, I Hear You’re a Book Worm…”
Austinites’s love of the outdoors is reflected in all the balconies, outdoor spaces, and plantings found on and around the building. The structure is impressive without being intimidating. The Birkenstock-shod slacker and the buttoned-down businessman will feel equally at ease here.
Gary Chapman and Ross Campbell believe it happens all too often. In fact, in some cases, the lack of “felt” love may be the root of poor attitudes and behavioral problems.
We finally have coasters! Whoo hoo! As I mentioned in the Linky Love post last Saturday, we have been needing some drinking coasters for a while now. I have been perusing the internet for a DIY coaster tutorial that was easy with a beautiful result. Well, I found out that there are a lot. But I really wanted to take a stab at the ceramic tile coasters. Ooh, violent. I know this ceramic tile coaster tutorial has been done many times, but c'mon people! We needed coasters really badly. I'll share with you what I did as well as the link to the tutorial I followed by Prudent Baby.
At EcoPrintMail we also analyze the best ways to sort your mail for maximum postage savings and least amount of travel. Often times US Postal Service trucks are required to make deliveries, even if they are not filled to capacity. This wastes resources and energy. But by utilizing our own in-house postal verification and drop shipping we are able to get your mail in the postal system quicker and without involving USPS trucks.
I don't know what I'm going to do with myself after it's over (besides sport that Tiffany necklace around like it's going out of style!), but you know what they say: when one door closes, another door opens!
Now, it's true, when everything else is equal, most people, men included, will go for the "pretty". I imagine most women would rather dance with the handsome dancer rather then the old, fat and bald one, if they are just as good dancers. You just have to become good enough that people love dancing with you or show that you are heading in that direction.
And somewhere during these chats, came up the topic of child sexual abuse which eventually turned into a month long initiative to spread awareness and break the taboo that we carry around CSA. If I may say so myself it was very well received and the feedback we got from the readers, the support we got from organisations like blogadda and many NGO’s and also the media mentions had us totally humbled us. The month will always be in my heart and mind as one of the milestone months of my life and CSA wasn’t the only that will make it memorable, it was also working so closely with the woman I came to admire even more, a woman who became much more than a blog buddy and moved on to become more like a sister.
Are you are looking to refuel your business with new ideas? If so you’ll find our speakers will ignite that passion you need to achieve success beyond your expectations. Who are our speakers? They are business gurus, TV presenters, professors, famous authors and successful entrepreneurs and all experts in their field with an innovative approach to business.
From underneath the very ground numerous cadavers suddenly erupted, seizing upon dwarves and adventurers alike with alarming alacrity; on the weakened eastern front a zombified bulette tore free from churned soil to descend upon the vulnerable dwarves and tear into their ranks. One of the vampire spawn lingered in the air beyond Brother Vang’s reach, mocking the faithful of Iomedae–before a shadow descended over the crusader’s foe as Aurakraul silenced it decisively. Lightning arced at Cassandra’s command as more volleys of arrows were loosed, the party moving to regroup and rebuke the newly arrived undead with desperate abandon.
Bernard M. Gordon
With your panties pressed to my face.
Nadya Suleman, the mother of those eight tiny in vitro-created babies, is waiting for the right price for her interview. And yes, we’re talking millions.
However, they are quite delicate and it has always been a source of irritation for both us and many others we've talked to.
When I was a wee nipper, I could never get my head around the adult addiction to things like The Magic Roundabout. Not for the seemingly obvious reason that it was a "children's show" but because of the time it was shown. I remember hearing about it being a success because it was on before the news, meaning all the adults got to watch it. But the news was on at 5.45 (only later moving to 6) and surely no grown-up was home from work by then? Certainly my Dad never was, and what other standard did I have to judge by?
January 23 - Jack LaLanne, fitness guru, 96
Violet has always been one of my favourite heroines in ya-literature. She's grown and developed so much throughout the series so far. Sometimes she does rather recklessly put herself in danger but she always does it for a good reason and you can't fault her for her desire to want to help others.
2005: Paul Konerko (6th)
I have been largely absent for the past month (or more) from blogging. I have shown up with a post, here and there. But mostly, not invested in what I was writing (with the recent exception of Storytelling Sunday). I want to apologize. I wish I could explain. There's nothing "major" going on in life that has prevented me from writing more often, or better posts, or sharing the crafty goodies I've been working on, or sharing the recent valley in my fitness quest. There's nothing wrong, I'm not overwhelmed with work or family or pet situations.
It's kind of sweet that I have come full circle. I will be teaching a Scrapbook 101 class on Tuesday, May 17 from 6:30pm-8pm at Scrapbook Buddies in Temple City.
But where do all of these boil down to? The need for acceptance? My ...need to become open with people who I want to be friends with? or is it just because I'm still fighting with a few things about who I am inside of me? I don't know, for now, as much as I'd want to say that I don't care what farm boy has to say, I'm interested to know what he thinks of all this.
It was much the same 84 years ago when a Southwestern Ontario native, the late Liberal Premier Mitch Hepburn, pushed through legislation to mandate the pasteurization of any milk sold in the province. The colourful premier took his stance in the face of tremendous opposition by his own base, the agricultural voters in the province. Major cities already were required to pasteurize milk.
@feenwager @bigdaddygamebot I get that. I can count on one hand the number of podcasts that I would’ve been happy to pay for and the Bombcast isn’t one of them (ironically, the old HotSpot which they originated from was worth paying for). I can’t tolerate shenanigans now for free podcasts as most shows can’t pull it off in an entertaining way. If you’re gonna go pro, you gotta go all the way.
popularity of ereaders and smartphones that can download books in seconds, more people are reading than ever before. I still love the feel of a hardcover book and continue to collect them but I tend to read on my ereader these days.
Models in a squad must remain within 2 inches of a leader model. There must always be a leader model in the unit. If the leader model is removed as a casualty, immediately choose another model. When a hero starts the game inside a squad, he/she is the leader.
So, I stand at the crossroad. One road leads me down the path I’ve been traveling. The other takes control of my writing career and literary journey. Both are uncertain, both are terrifying. Which would you chose?
I slave over that manuscript for hours every week, writing during every spare moment I have, often long into the night when I could be enjoying some much-needed sleep. And when I don’t have time to work on my novel, I think about it. My story is constantly tugging at the corners of my mind, and the characters are always before me, begging, “What’s going to happen to us next? Hurry up and write the next chapter.”
Preceded by recent horror shorts:
I am humbled by that man.
3Remember therefore how thou hast received and heard, and hold fast, and repent. If therefore thou shalt not watch, I will come on thee as a thief, and thou shalt not know what hour I will come upon thee.
The Buck Pets - The Buck Pets (Island 1989)
First I covered my kraft tag with 3 patterned papers trimming them just smaller than the tag. Then I stamped out the sentiment and adhered that with some double sided tape. I coloured my image with copic markers, trimmed her out and adhered here with 3D foam dots, just slightly over the sentiment.
I tend the holy within me by….
Some message I’m sent to share.
When: Early October
I'll leave you with 2 pages from the Ledger.
In shades of a more-earthly grey:
Freddy & The Dreamers I’m telling you now UK
Myth 2: Suicides increase over the holidays.
“I warn you this better stop or I am going to the Police with this.”
Shervin Pishevar
How then?
I've had a lot on my plate these last couple of weeks but hope to be back in the craft room next week. Hubby and I are taking a much needed break and will be spending the next few days in Atlantic City, where we always have a great time. WOO HOO!
Suite Scarlett, like its predecessor, is sweet and charming. It’s funny and peculiar; it’s gripping despite having no real conflict. Maureen Johnson’s writing is witty, and it flows like the soul of a passed on fish through the River Styx, succeeding in avoiding collision with the debris that the other dead things had thrown into the river. Which means that yes, the fish is dead, which is rather depressing, but the book flowed well, which should appease you enough to forget about the dearly departed fish. Also, have I mentioned that this book is funny? Funny in the Maureen Johnson several mad people trapped in a box with one cup of lukewarm tea and a polka dotted sock way. Which means really funny. The setting, while not a particularly unique as settings go (if you fail to pull up at least one example of New York being used a centre of creative energy in books, movies and other such things, then you might as well be dead. The rest of the world certainly considers you to be so.), does very well to support the novel in all of its endeavours. And on a contradictory note, what other madcap YA comedy/romance/type thing takes place in a crumbling twenties hotel? If you cannot pull up one instance, then I like you. The people who can present me with one more example, you are the scum of the earth.
But THANK YOU GOD, our little family is doing well. We have started up on our school year again and we are enjoying doing classes. Waiting for the HOLIDAYS to come. It is just around the corner now!!!! We take one day at a time and we take our evenings very seriously. We have tried to keep matthew to a strict in bed time of 8:30 to make sure he gets plenty of sleep. So needless to say, we are ALL on a schedule now. We tend to notice if we have had a LONG day, he will end up with a seizure!!
~Proverbs 16:24
There was a sharp difference between the dark and stormy ones
When I found out about what Deryl had been doing back in February, as you can imagine, I was in shock. I was completely devastated. From the very day that I called my sister and told her what was going on she told me that she knew how bad it was and what it looked like but in her spirit she saw Deryl and I married. She said she knew God had a calling on our lives and that God hasn't changed his mind. Each and every single time, she would claim this, speak this over me.
I could not believe how much money I spent on supplies I never used. I use to go to the craft store every day and buy something. I believe this is one of the downfalls of being a creative person. I want to try everything out creatively. If hobby lobby, Michael's or Joanne's sells it, I have to buy it and try it.
Here's what I came up with, thanks to Stampin' Up!'s Tickets & Tags Simply Scrappin' kit (great colours, don't you think?):
13. "Road Man" by Smash Mouth.
You can find a quick explanation of Groovy Mums by clicking here http://kateonthinice.wordpress.com/how-to-be-a-groovy-mum/. If you read this, you should have an idea of whether this is for you or not at this time. From my point of view, all mums are welcome.
-1 15 oz. can artichoke hearts, rinsed and quartered
Hug me, Hold me, never let me go….I just wanted to take a moment to say something very very important! Words are only words….Hugs and time together mean so much more than words…espically when the other person needs you, your love and your support…so please never forget as you depend on others (even if you do not want to admit to it) they depend on you also (even if they do not want to admit it either)! So….JUST HUG ME DON’T TALK!
My son started planning his 7th birthday party slightly before his 6th birthday party happened. His 6th birthday had a superhero theme with a fantastic Spider-Man cake, one of my favorite cakes I'd done. For his 7th he wanted Star Wars. I started planning an R2 D2 cake. I thought about a Millennium Falcon. Nope, he wanted an X-Wing. Really? Does he think I'm Cake Boss Buddy? He would do an amazing one. Me? My skills are limited. I couldn't quite figure out how to do the X wings, so they are closed on this one.
to have a
Vaccines, biotechnology and their connection with induced abortion
*To those upset by my comment about greed, just let me say, this is my opinion only. It's based on what I've read (including minutes of the town council meetings and comments by the property owner), and what I've heard. The owner did know going in that the barn was of historical significance. He did refuse to continue the easement agreement. He then placed an astronomical price on the structure (one which the historical society could not even hope to meet). So yes, perhaps this man does buy properties to flip them. Fine, but threatening to sell the barn signage on eBay....no comment. Threatening demolition of a historically significant building if the city can't meet his price? Again, no comment.
(Jun & David, don't read this part) But what was I thinking? I'm a freaking librarian with a small refrig and basic oven. I've only make food for my library, and this was a 125 person reception. Thus, I got 5 hours of sleep in two days. But it was so worth it! The wedding and reception was so much fun!
He was rolled up on the tables in Red Sand Black Moon for Hykar. He had Savvy 4, Strength 4, and Speed 3. He added Swordsman to the standard Warrior Signatures. With his weapon, shield, and armor, he came up to a rating of 9, 3 above Cromak.
Our last day there, I stayed behind to supervise the movers. After the final box was packed, the neighbors gathered to say goodbye. As we stood on the porch, I looked out over the lake and around at the thick foliage enclosing us in lacy shadows. Then I studied our dear neighbors. One, a young nurse, had terminal cancer but she’d driven down in her electric scooter. Another had lost her husband months earlier and George had conducted the funeral. The couple that lived at the bottom of our driveway and watched over everyone had climbed the steep driveway. I stood in the calm and the beauty of this place, feeling the love of our neighbors and wondered, “Why are we leaving?”
In this statement, there is a big implication as to the proper use of lunar energy. If you have a condition in your life – perhaps a health, career, or financial condition, or even a stagnant relationship in which the two people have become bored with one another or have started taking the other for granted (this is a very common thing, you see) – these conditions need to be changed. To move a relationship from being stagnant to being active again means that you have focused your thought power on making the relationship no longer stagnant. You have put your time and effort into doing so. To enhance this power, which is magical and thought power, you can draw down the energy of the Moon.
I'm tired, and taking a break like the rest of the blogging world. I'll be posting my insecurity tomorrow and doing the blog hops I've signed up for... and reflection post is a must! (I laughed so hard writing that one, my eyes were streaming rivers.)
These are all very negative and impact not only the relationship but also the aspie partner's self esteem.
As Gadget reader Shafted Bluenose says; how would G4S have dealt with this? (Notice she calls the police officer a ‘for profit’ policeman)
I did really like Laurel as a main character! She was ambitious, and did not back down when people were mean to her! She was the kind of character you admired in every sense of the word! I hope to read more about her soon!
My son Wyatt will be four years old on December 25th. His birthday is on Christmas day – so it is hard to plan his birthday party every year. Of course we will never have his party on his actual birthday, so this year I planned it for the beginning of the month.
While there is occasional drama in the blogosphere I suppose what I want newer bloggers, or even just disillusioned bloggers, to focus on is the very real relationships that come about because of blogging. All of the swirling angst is irrelevant. It doesn't matter what authors and publishers say or what they want. It doesn't matter if you write "reviews" or "reactions." It doesn't matter what anyone's opinion of blogging may be. It doesn't matter if you're getting paid or not. We do this for us and we do this for each other. We blog because we love books and we love sharing what we read.
Meantime, quick recap.
Small and cute, the table are tiiiny! Cash only, the prices are very reasonable. The place has a genuine italian feel and the menu has your typical italian fare, bruscetta, antipasta, salads, pasta, entrees. And the best part has to be the specials. I’m a sucker for specials, makes me feel like I’m living in the moment. Their specials list, pictured here, has a wealth of choices – impressive given the size of their kitchen makes mine look grand.
Pakistan expert Professor Shaun Gregory said such a killing was “actually quite rare” in that country.
World Court of Women against War, for Peace
Newspaper articles and campaigns by safety advocates had brought some attention to the problem, but its visibility grew when a March 2009 article by Gene Weingarten in The Washington Post Magazine, “Fatal Distraction,” asked whether the mistake of forgetting a child in the back seat of a car was also a crime. The article won the 2010 Pulitzer Prize for feature writing…
Books to use in collaboration with the Growing and Changing theme:
“Ron”: Ok, so pretty basic features then so, every phone here will be able to do that for you.
03 Twenty Four Hours (Live from the High Hall, Birmingham 2 May 1980)
There are a number of different types of lightning, but fork lightning is the most impressive to photograph. Sheet lightning will light up your whole surroundings but in a photo it is likely to just look like a stormy day, even in the middle of the night.
Anger abates, but is still there. Justice is not done. Won't be done. Such is life.
What isn't funny is that while Matt was digging and getting the steps out he found a lot of empty liquor bottles. We've decided that either the person who built our house or the person who did major foundation repairs to our house was an alcoholic. Either way it's bad but it does explain quite a bit.
As a gorilla who is instinctively chivalrous to the human female, I have often wrongly been accused of flirting. I recall an incident from my circus days, when we hired a “glamour model” called Tracey to help us with our promotions. The female acrobats were given the job of looking after her, and seemed less than impressed with her airs and poses. Things came to a head when Tracey strutted before me in a pair of shiny hot-pants.
Vanessa :)
(sitting at desk at work) "I can't believe I ate a potato chip this morning. I hate myself."
Yes, it might happen to you. Yes, it is a frightening thought that one day you may find yourself living with a disability. And yes, it is easier to turn away from disability if it doesn't directly affect you. But what would happen if you or your child were unexpectedly diagnosed with a condition that left either of you unable to work or live the life you had become accustomed to? What would you do if you heard that a member of your family had just been diagnosed with cancer, epilepsy, autism, or any other disability that would change their life forever? How about if it was you who'd been diagnosed with these conditions and illnesses. It doesn't bear thinking about does it?
“But…” I began
Alfred Hitchcock directs this thriller about a wrongly accused man who finds himself flung into a international conspiracy of spies. The troubles of our hero Richard Hannay, about whom we know only that he is Canadian, begin at a London music hall. When a gun goes off in the theater, Hannay allows a frightened woman to come home with him. An easy-going host, Hannay becomes intrigued as the mysteriously Slavic “Annabelle Smith” tells him about her work as an agent. She is a haunted and hunted woman. When she wakes him in the middle of the night with a knife in her back and a map in her hand, Hannay gives himself only one option: to follow her map to a small village in Scotland. Of course, the police are now after Hannay for the woman’s murder, but he is fearlessly bent on his freedom and stays on the lam even as he is handcuffed to Pamela, another innocent who — unfortunately for Hannay — truly believes him to be a murderer. Yet, what a wonderful way to fall in love… In a bit of storytelling genius, the end of the movie returns again to the same music hall where the same act performs — it’s the key to understanding the meaning of “the 39 steps.”
We are the ones who grow bored in the flesh. Ailments, pressures, anxieties, people-the flesh has a way of wearing us down, burning us out, beating us up and we fail. But God strengthens us according to His strength, according to his glorious might. I wonder if this means that we always have enough strength even when we find ourselves particularly weak. I wonder if this means that our weakness isn’t quite as bad as we like to imagine it?
Could I laugh about beige? Admittedly, for a few moments I couldn't. Something about it was kind of disturbing to me. I thought, "Where have I gone wrong?" There he was on the floor near my feet pretending cars could fly and blow up midair and he's into beige? I felt my parenting must have gone terribly awry some where along the line. Christ, BEIGE???? My son not only likes it, but REALLY likes it. I kept hearing his little voice repeating "beige" over and over in my mind. I kept thinking, beige is bland. Beige is safe. Beige is boring. My closet is bursting with all shades of that ubiquitous "non-color" and of course it's soulmate, black. Damn it, I thought. My lack of courageous fashion sense had damaged him. I felt kind of sad. All those years of playing it safe with all the classic "neutral" decor and it turns out I killed my son's creativity. Temporarily insane thinking? Probably. Sexist? Maybe.
Mad Merlot Mama
I did especially enjoy the almost circular ending. I finished the book very late last night, and immediately reread the first chapter. All of a sudden, so much more made sense. The first chapter serves as a great lead to pull you into the book, as you question exactly what is happening. It also serves as a great ending, so make sure you do reread it after finishing the book! My opinions on the characters also changed as the book went on. Godbersen slowly made each character seem more human as the plot unfolded, and characters that I hated as first began to seem more human.
Standing in the shower I start singing the words. Okay, I thought, that’s powerful. But I’m still waking up here, Father. I get it, I get it.
So over this....
Around 11pm, my dear, wonderful son Art Dog walked through the door glad to see the life he was used to seeing followed my dear husband!! I flew into his arms and told him how traumatic it was not having him there ;-)
Appeal towards her better nature.
Not yet two years after the Department of Energy awarded $43 million in loan guarantees for Beacon Power's energy storage plant, government attorneys are calling the bankrupt solar company and its affiliates little more than "empty shells" benefiting lawyers and other bankruptcy professionals.
I'm that dad because they are those kids, bright, eager, interesting, and still fully possessed of their never-lost sense of wonder at this incredible universe.
But it’s really fun. I’ve never been much of a biker since middle school, and I find it challenging to push myself without knowing exactly what I’m capable of… I suppose another way to put it is that because I’m not very familiar with spin techniques and workout patterns, the instructor can say we’re going to do whatever, and I’ll give it my best shot, because I don’t know yet how much that whatever will kick my ass. Oh dear, I feel I’m rambling and not making any sense. Better just move on.
And a final reminder... today is the last day you can enter the competition to win a signed copy of Talli's first novel "The Hating Game". To enter, go here, watch the video and comment on the post. I said the closing date was the 29/04/11 but any entry made by the time I get back from work tomorrow (about 21 hours) will be entered...
As you can see, the possibilities are endless. My ultimate goal, however, is my own HGTV show and perhaps a book, both entitled Better Living through Reese’s Peanut Butter Cups, but at the very least I should be able to score a guest appearance on The Nate Berkus Show, don’t you think?
03. Calido Amor
When a new product launch does not achieve the success that was hoped for, often the root cause is that the targeting is not right.
Who are you my dear comrade?
Finally, I really bonded with that beautiful brown horse. We were friends, whatever her name was that I've now forgotten, and I. I can't wait to try this again!
1 flood
Though the reality of two version of The Selecter has always been intriguing on a certain level, its also been a shame that the original members have been unable to patch up whatever differences existed between them and come together to properly honor their legacy. With this decision, Davies, who has also been playing and performing under The Selecter band name will be known as Neol Davies AKA The Selecter for any of his future musical projects. Davies has been invited to perform at the 2012 London International Ska Festival.
At the same time, I realized that I had kind of been neglecting myself a bit too. Don't get me wrong, I feel very fortunate to so thoroughly enjoy being with my children that I really don't ever feel the need to "get away". I guess that's why it was so hard for me to see that not taking time for myself was actually hurting me and my family. It was hard for me, hard for my girls, and hard for my husband when I was away, so I felt like it made everyone's life easier if I just always had at least one of the girls with me at all times. I felt selfish when I thought of doing things alone, knowing my girls would be sad and my hubby would be stressed if I left.
Let me tell you a little about how this all started before I ask for your help.
So who is my routine workout buddy? During times like now when I have lots of finals, it’s my study guides! This afternoon I had a test at 12:20 in my, ironically enough, Health Benefits of Exercise class. So I headed to the gym with my study guide in hand and sweat it out on the ARC trainer for 45 minutes while reading over my study guide non-stop.
Spanish teacher and mother-of-three Shannon Cardinal, 43, is facing 186 years in prison for an alleged sexual relationship with a former student, aged 16
From director Fumihiko Sori (TO, VEXILLE) comes the CGI/anime epic DRAGON AGE: DAWN OF THE SEEKER, a USA-Japan collaboration which takes Sori's familiar visual style from the hard sci-fi of TO into the realm of sword and sorcery.
Well, today is May 4th, which means it's Star Wars Day! I still love the original three movies (the new ones? meh.), so I couldn't pass up the chance to celebrate with a little softie Ewok! They are really quick to make, and are safe for even the littlest Star Wars fan to love.
Happy Sunday - I hope you all had a great weekend! Yesterday, my daughter Courtney and I along with my sister, niece and Courtney's friend all went wedding dress shopping. Yes....Courtney is getting married June 2013. After 5 bridal shops, she finally said "yes" to the dress. She looks absolutely beautiful and the dress is perfect! :)
OSHA has very stringent requirements the online version of the 10 hour training course. For online versions of the course, the provider must:
Dylan nodded his head and wondered what his mom would think of this woman. He knew she’d mightily disapprove because she hated cops. What had he been thinking, anyway? Suddenly the truculent boy came back and he slumped against the back of the booth. Frio’s eyebrows rose, but she looked away, seeming to make note of something.
-How will Ella adjust?
I fear for the people of that country because, as they advance at the higher levels, they degrade at the lower levels. And if you build a house with a heavy roof, weak walls and shitty foundations it is inevitable that it will collapse.
I think it's the perfect necklace for spring and summer, and I just had to have one! However, I definitely could not justify spending $150 on it. So, I searched and searched for one that was cheaper and stumbled upon Karlee Dutson's blog, Bubbly Yours, where she sells look-a-likes for almost a fourth of the price!
There are some things that would be awesome if they trended, such as: #freemoneygiveawayfrombillgates, #downloadintelligencelikethematrixrighthere, #freeapplesharesforyou, #howtomakeaspaceship, #becomemassivelydisgustinglyfamousinaninstant, #youknowthatcaryouwantwewillgivetoyou and my personal favourite, #everythingyoueverwantedforyourightnowatnocostever
happy, happy, birthday! :: congrats! you're one year closer to yelling at kids to get off your lawn.
On my honor, I will try:
Needed:
Janis stayed on with Jane and we set off into the night.
Adieu, there is nothing that I will not brave for your sake; you deserve much more than that.
Now confession time, I had to scrap the idea of a tutorial today when I realized I didn't really know how to use my Cinch. It turns out I need a little more practice, lol. Anyway, here is the final product.
Busted!: In which Stone reveals that hazardous nuclear waste is an unnecessary evil, as the technology to utterly deplete fuel was developed by GE engineers in the 70s, and kiboshed by President Carter days after he entered the Oval Office.
said a case of murder was being investigated. "She was allegedly killed
Erected by public subscription in honoured memory of the gallant men of Walker who sacrificed their lives in the Great War 1914-1918, 1939-1945.
I finally found it.
There is no easy answer.
If the plight of the poor is more annoying than heartbreaking to us, and we don’t work for social justice because “it’s not our problem,” we’re missing the point.
dani Blooms
Question everything. Learn something. Answer nothing.
Will it Return?
9. Who Are the Brain Police? (03:30)
Also please remember our kids hospitalized over this holiday weekend and help put a smile on their faces by sending in your kids cards to SAS4Kids. All the information needed is in the tabs at the top of this page or on our homepage. And for our U.S.A. friends, have a wonderful 4th of July weekend!
These are in no particular order:
This was a little impulse buy, but again something I have heard a lot about. Sleek Make-up is a brand I haven’t explored too much, but one I always admire in the shop. As I love nay NEED some sort of lip balm with me at all times, I though a tinted one would make a nice change. So here it is…
It's a fine line, I know.
Anyway...she has a new book out and I just bought it today. I've thumbed through it and it looks great, although I wish there were more photos of her beautiful table settings and flower arrangements! The recipes look great though and I can't wait to try them out!
The same goes for food and beer, both of which I consider to be art forms, so when breweries like Dogfish Head continually crank out great beers that do not conform to established standards, my conservative notion of "rules" is left floundering, while my palate is expanded, creating the desire for more of the same rule-breaking.
STEP 5: From this point forward, ALL pitches will be thrown AT Derek Jeter. Somebody needs to teach him a lesson and we all know he doesn’t move well enough to get out of the way anymore.
My favorite anecdote in the book occurred in December of 1971, when Monk and his wife Nellie went to see The Duke Ellington Orchestra at The Rainbow Grill in Rockefeller Center, New York City. The band was in full “swing” as Monk walked toward a table to sit down; Duke eyed him from the stage and immediately cut the band off in mid song and approached the mike. “Ladies and gentlemen, the baddest left hand in the history of jazz has just entered the room, Mr. Thelonious Monk.” Monk stood there smiling at Duke as the crowd gave him a long ovation. Thelonious had started taking piano lessons at the age of 11 in 1928. After 43 years of people telling Monk how he sounded, the great Duke Ellington had just given him his ultimate compliment. On this night, Thelonious Monk didn’t mind being labeled at all.
Kiss AMC A bit of (U2) UK
IN LESS THAN 10 MINUTES IT WILL BE THE 1ST OF MAY AND I'M FREAKING EXCITED BECAUSE SHINE IS GOING TO COME OUT AND I NEED TO SQUEE LIKE A MADWOMAN ABOUT IT! I just re-read Shade and Shift this past week and I'm soooo ready for it!
chaotic unassortments
Further south, the Plage du Port is a little protected cove, over which I looked during lunch on the terrace of Le Caritz.
When you work for someone, you owe them an honest day's work for an honest day's pay and when either party isn't getting that, then it's time to go your separate ways. Now I know there are truly unfair and even criminal situations that occur, but that aside... it's ultimately our individual choice as to who or what we let control or take care of us. I think many older generations took care of themselves rather than relying on someone to take care of them.
April 12, 2012
An email was sent to the membership list, and the Coney will be informed in case anyone calls there to ask.
The conversation at the park revised:
Blessings to all!
Not a lot has being going on academic front since last update as boys are free till Ramadan starts next week!
and orange peels.
friend of mine described it 'jumpy as fuck!'. What! What! fucking
The floodgates have opened and lately all I can think about is writing. I save just a little bit of this motivation for this space here. I figure after being terribly neglectful for the majority of its existence, my blog deserves some love. Luckily for me, you can ignore a blog for months at a time without too many repercussions (you can also call it dirty names, attend to it after a few glasses of wine and easily take it with you when you travel). If those merits make little sense to you, then you haven’t seen my list of reasons I do not want kids. But that is another subject entirely and not at all to do with why I am here. Why am I here?
I'll be looking at this pink rocker to get me through my Monday!
Are you suffering from sweaty palms? Is your personal and professional life being tampered due to this illness? I am writing this article as a relief for those who are victims of excessive sweating.
Or do enjoy the new perspective?
Aureolin
Me: (???? duh!!) Yessir. So I had a cock gun and I just went to town. It was fun. I'm getting pretty good w/cock Dad. Need anything cocked at home? Cause I'll do it!
Well, isn't that a mouthful for a title! Teachers go back to school on Monday, and students start the following Monday. Like many of you, I've been spending my time getting things ready, making things, and setting up my room. Here are some things I use in my classroom that I thought might be helpful to others.
The patient officer waited until he was only two car lengths behind his target before igniting his red and blue lights. Three cars slowed to the right shoulder as the roadside was bleached by the trooper’s headlights and spotlight. They all came to a full stop about a half mile short of the Oklahoma state line.
Firstly, the violence that may occur at a protest is confined to small groups of individuals and this is not representative of the larger mood of actions of protesters. The Manchester anti cuts march on the 29th of January proved this, not only did unions and students take to the streets but so too did young children and families. Toddlers smiled from their prams with the hustle and bustle of the march and school children of all ages raised signs from ‘Let me learn’ right down to cut nuclear ‘weapons not my future.’
I still can't believe I made it this far without missing a single day. A few times I was sure I was going to forget to post or miss a day and get behind, but thankfully, those situations were avoided. (I'll admit that a few of the days I posted really late, though...)
Watching a movie at the boyfie's place with his whole family. Then suddenly there is a short few seconds to a minute where someone is wildly making out. Errrrr!!!! I could feel my face growing red. It seemed so wrong to watch something like that with the boyfie's parents and brothers. arrrrghhhh.
submissions@bookends-inc.com
I ran after You, crying; but You were gone.
software for digital Cameras could permit you to monitor and file the events at a lot of areas as well. Most of these also permit you to keep an eye on your home, family members, or business enterprise, irrespective of where you might be. You may use your ourite-snail mail, the world wide web, or cellular phone for watching.
I for one have never liked my name. I always thought “Barbara” was too common and ordinary. What’s more, I couldn’t identify with the name. I never felt like a “Barbara.” From the time I was 4 or 5 years old, I insisted that people call me Bobbie instead. I’ve known a number of people who evade their name by suing their middle name, and still others who go by their initials.
Yep, all the time. Gone are the days of the normal reaction of ‘oops’ or ‘I cocked up there’ (did they even exist?). Now, it’s the end of the world if I make a mistake, or if something goes wrong. I recently ran an event, the whole day was a complete success, and I was thanked by many people for all the work I had put in to make it run so smoothly. There was, however, one small error that I made, and I tortured myself for days over it.I forgot all about the positive feedback that I had recieved – this one small error led to a long period of suicidal ideation because I clearly wasn’t good enough to be allowed to live any longer.
And my favourite:
There will always be books which are not appropriate for mainstream publication, because of their subject matter or their writer’s lack of experience or talent. I would never recommend that the authors of these books use a vanity press: such presses are almost always exploitative, costly and ineffectual when it comes down to producing a high-quality book and then selling those books to anyone but their authors. So what alternatives are out there for writers who are desperate for publication, but who are not likely to attract the attentions of the mainstream press?
You see, it’s easy to amend your views when South Africa is so broken.
Ummm... whoa. Cinnamon sweet cream base with chunks of oatmeal cookies and fudge. What could be bad about that?
Likewise, the Gallic "bête seller", the type of novel that hasn't got much going for it from a literary and artistic point of view, but sells in its thousands (no names mentioned, but there's a certain author who writes political thrillers that comes to mind), could easily morph into "beast-seller". In Cuban Spanish we've come very close to a literal translation. When a movie or a book is really good, especially from a commercial point of view, we sometimes tend to say: "¡Qué monstruo de película/libro!"
And while it may seem repugnant to some in the region, what it could serve to do is make the sight of two men and interracial as not such a big deal after a while.
"Japanese Chick sexing ties in with what I know about my father who was a chick sexer and worked in HB. What I know is that the Japanese who taught the craft skill were no longer allowed to continue their highly skilled precision work after Pearl Harbour or thereabouts with declaration of war and WW2. The role of chick sexing thereafter was passed onto others. It was important work with I believe food production shortages and those skilled were highly paid.
"1stKiss" with Layers function selected cut from the Sweethearts cartridge at 6 inches from brown and vanilla cardstock, and green polkadot patterned paper.
God has put it on my heart after struggling to get my 6 year old to do any "seatwork". I began home schooling her 3 weeks ago, after 1 1/2 years of public education. I have workbooks and some texts. I have tried very hard to not call what I teach her "school work" so that she will have a positive outlook on it (homework was often a battle). But I have this voice in the back of my head (not literally…lol) telling me she won't amount to anything without an "education”, as she cries and complains while writing out her mispelled words.
Speaking of Poe, he is a major player in another nonfiction book about the case which I read all the way through: The Beautiful Cigar Girl by Daniel Stashower. This is a standard work of historical true crime, made sexier by Poe’s role in the story. It suffers a bit from the basic problem with the Mary Rogers story — we never do find out what, exactly, happened to her and who was responsible — as opposed to other great works of historical true crime, like The Devil in the White City and The Suspicions of Mr. Whicher. Those books give you an answer to what the hell happened. Stashower’s book gave me a lot more insight into Poe, so that was a plus. If you’re interested in this story or in that genre, I recommend it. The subtitle, I must say, is a bit much: “Mary Rogers, Edgar Allan Poe and the Invention of Murder.” I get that you want to get Poe in there. And I get that this case was part of the beginnings of both widespread public interest in crime, via the new popular press. But murder’s been around for a long time, hasn’t it?
Michael had so much energy for beer, malt beverages, and people, and was a genuinely nice person. He was a true gentleman.
We soon found out that the freshly cooked food was very very good and the portions enormous, and the staff chatty and friendly. All in all this was a real find and no doubt so much better to eat at than any of the cafes on the road to the market. Although we did not try the food in the Countryman, I am glad we tried the Tuns.
Therefore although He knew of Himself what was done, yet before it was told Him He withdrew not, that He might shew the verity of His incarnation in all things; for He would that this should be assured not by sight only, but by His actions. And when He withdrew, He did not go into the city, but into the desert by ship that none might follow Him. Yet do not the multitudes leave Him even for this, but still follow after Him, not deterred by what had been done concerning John.
Apart from trust in the Messiah, who is our Passover, there is no escape from sin and the judgment of sin (the utter destruction of final death) after the last judgment.
b) recall the details of what else was on the plate. I drank a lot of wine (the waitress kept refilling my glass) and I was having too good a time to take notes;
I loved the results of this activity! I would love to think of some more STEM activities that are Kindergarten appropriate! Do you know of any? I did find one Kindergarten STEM site with lots of activities on it, but I would like to find more. Can you share them by leaving a comment? (I love comments!!!) Thanks!
Original Gravity: 16 degrees Plato
* Kathryn Joosten as Aunt Jackie Seville
Jeanette Dorner, Salmon & Ecosystem Recovery, Puget Sound Partnership
Hello! Welcome back to The Paper Shelter! Today is Wednesday and we are very excited to announce the new challenge. But, before we get to that, let's announce last week's winner.
I hate bras
The idea of ' shopping' is sort of old fashioned anyway. We're always shopping, even when we're at work.
If the first song draws you in, the next one, “Revolution,” smacks you in the head. The influence of 1970s Ethiopian jazz is clear here with the baritone sax and spidery organ solo by Rebennack himself. Like other tunes on Locked Down — “Ice Age” for instance — the lyrics are thick with politics. “Guerilla warfare, Lady Liberty/Propaganda, hypocrisy/Did we lose our Constitution?/Prepare, revolution.” “You Lie” also is full of political outrage. It’s an African-sounding tune as well, featuring Auerbach playing some intense, blues-infused guitar.
Spring forward to the next season, spring, and see that small groups ended and we all went on our own merry way. I was not continuing in the leading of small groups for the upcoming seasons as I felt spiritually drained and told myself I needed to refill my cup. This was also a time that I had been seeking theology and hearing different preachers preach on different ideas. I found a school of theology that had a large source of their curriculum on iTunes University and I was really stoked to have the opportunity to learn theology in that manner. Days passed by and turned into weeks passed by and I hadn’t listened to a single sermon, or lecture if you want to call it that. In fact, reading from the Bible decreased as well as consistent prayer. It got to a point that I had reached before where I was just going through the motions of attending church and not praying or opening a Bible. Shoot, at one point I just stopped going to church on Sunday’s, telling myself I had “more important” things to do.
-You laugh and laugh when I call you pumpernickel!
1. Coach Tim Cone’s now with B-Meg Llamados. Yes, that’s right. After mentoring Alaska for twenty years, Coach Tim decided that it was now time to try out a different franchise. After coach Tim announced his departure from Alaska, a lot of fans are already talking about the possibility of him coaching the Llamados. True enough, after some time B-Meg announced that they’re hiring Tim Cone to do the coaching for them. This is very exciting, how shall the Triangle affect the team’s performance? Will coach Tim’s Triangle give the Llamados the mythic grand slam? Can’t wait Can’t wait.
For my earlier book, The Women of the House, I researched a trader named Margaret Hardenbroeck, who through smarts and sheer force of will became the richest woman in the colony that would become New York . She-merchants were common in New Amsterdam , where there were roughly two hundred female traders out of a population of 1,500 settlers—a very high percentage. Women such as Margaret Hardenbroeck (and Blandine van Couvering in THE ORPHANMASTER) loved the excitement of commerce, especially the high-end, high-status commodities like fur. Blandine is a young merchant, still earnestly trying to work her way up.
1/8 tsp ground cardamom
The next section deals with getting advice into public sector programmes which seems to be more awareness related and something the IPO itself will take on.
Thanks for tolerating such drivel and actually encouraging more of the same.
"NewsNight Akron" has featured both Mansfield and a regular panel of Akron area print and broadcast journalists discussing the week's news events that affect the Akron area...
I felt like I did "normal people stuff." And I'm glad I did.
bountiful baskets is a co-op organization that is run
The mercury had climbed up to 30 C (with 90% humidity) by the time entree was served and we all agreed this light and refreshing dish was a very good choice indeed.
To be clear, the Kindle Fire is much less capable and versatile than the entry-level $499 iPad 2. It has a fraction of the apps, a smaller screen, much weaker battery life, a slower Web browser, half the internal storage and no cameras or microphone. It also has a rigid and somewhat frustrating user interface far less fluid than Apple’s.
Since October I have been struggling between the yellow and red zones. My restriction is ok, not great. When I recently had .3 cc's removed because it was too tight. My heaven-sent PA said "I think you're gonna need a fill later." I relied "Really? Can you add just .1cc?" feeling panicked at that moment since I was feeling like I was auditioning for the part of a professional puker. She made a face that I read as "Maybe, but don't count on it."
In the same way, if the Republicans succeed in rebranding, say, public assistance and food safety laws as Marxist, the most likely result of that campaign will be to convince a great many Americans of otherwise moderate political views that Marx might have had something going for him after all. As suggested above, I don’t consider this a good thing; in theory, Marxist revolution leads to the glorious worker’s paradise of the future via the inevitable workings of the historical dialectic, but in practice the dictatorship of the proletariat reliably turns into just another dictatorship, with the usual quota of gulags and unmarked mass graves. Still, in a country where most people are frighteningly ignorant of history, and are being driven to the wall by a corrupt and spectacularly mismanaged imperial economy in headlong decline, it’s unpleasantly unlikely that this point will be remembered.
Then I was introduced to Eleviv. It is a natural product lowers the stress hormone cortisal. It has many benefits, but the only thing that I care about is what it did for me.
This is one event I wish I could attend as a vendor, but my creations need a lot of light to show off my sea glass jewelry. So I have sent some items to the popular handmade shop, Jersey Made (located in the Mill Race Village section of Mount Holly).
LCD Televisions are Liquid Crystal Display TV sets which are currently become a huge trend and big attention snatcher because of their superior picture display, great resolution, lucidity as well as excellent transmission. Within an LCD television, a light shines via a panel of liquid crystals to be able to feature a picture. To deliver an even more standard picture, the light is actually spread and rerouted equally by a bright diffusion panel positioned in back of the TV.
(And I hope I don't have to do an Ami Angelwings FAQ thing here and people know that intent doesn't matter, whether they meant to be cute or evil is irrelevant, it's still problematic and nobody can convince me fortune cookies were chosen at random and not because he's Chinese e_e)
05 August 2011
In the meantime, I didn't want to leave you hanging for too long. My stamping friends have a marvelous Technique Hop they posted last night in the wee hours and I wanted to be sure you saw their creations! Please check out my friend, Debi's, blog for the start of the hop.
For instance, a couple of years ago, I told myself that I was going to take advantage of my company’s (unpaid) Sabbatical policy and take a big chunk of time off to get all of the boxes and boxes and boxes of random written documentation of my life—everything from birthday cards to letters from camp to diaries to notes passed in class—organized and catalogued so that I could begin to write a type of creative nonfiction memoir thing. Man, I was excited about this idea. I even had a title in mind for what I wanted the end product to be called. My plan was that I would spend part of my days doing the physical cataloguing and creating notes that would piece together what the narrative of the story would be. My goal would be to capture the essence of that CRAZIEST/WILDEST/FUNNIEST person I’d once been, and tell her story. I’d spend full, glorious days writing, writing, and writing some more. I’d take breaks now and again to work out or go take a swim, but my main focus would be my complete immersion in and devotion to the creative process. At the end of these hypothetical days, I’d go get the Geej from school and then be totally devoted to my time with her without being distracted by the incessant gnawing in my gut caused by my horribly neglected creative muse.
While I am flattered by the good Mayor’s concern for my health, I clearly don’t need it. This is just the latest attempt to govern personal behavior for the greater good. And if you think it is going to stop at NYC, guess again. If the new health care system gets passed, we can expect this kind of thing on a regular basis from the government. We have already seen the argument being made during the 90′s and the demonization of smokers. I am not a smoker (well, the occasional cigar) and never have been. When restaurants started to ban smoking, I voted against it because I could see the end game. If they can ban a completely legal substance to be used in a public place, what’s next? But people bought into the public health argument and we now have an almost universal ban on smoking in public. It’s the new prohibition. Only this time, they are not banning the substance, they are regulating the use of it.
The pants, however, are another matter:
I had the quad screen and it came back negative for an elevated risk of having a baby with DS. At the time, I didn't know it only screens your risk level and is not a definitive test. After working with breastfeeding mothers, I wanted to be able to anticipate any feeding difficulties or know if my baby would need extra attention after birth. We thought this test would meet that need. Turns out it didn't.
"Bugsy, you can't write "Christmas" there - it's gonna offend somebody! An' don't call me 'boss'."
Do you hate rich people? He does too.
And then this evening I remembered last night. I woke up to go to the bathroom and my pjs were incredibly wet. There was no blood so I breathed easier and thought that maybe I had gotten really sweaty there. Even though I didn't feel hot anywhere else. I went back to bed and ultimately back to sleep. At the time, I didn't worry.
While I was home my middle sister showed me a skin condition she developed after her health crisis a few years ago. She always had a little bit of it behind her ears like I do, dry skin and a little dandruff, more if we are stressed out. But now she has it all over her back and on the soft skin on her forearms. It looks like it hurts but she says it just itches. The dermatologists were shooting her up with steroids and giving her medicinal creams and nothing was working. One doctor would not even touch her he found her condition so disturbing. Nice. I took her to the health food store that opened up there a few years ago and bought her some flax seed oil caps and some calendula gel and some other stuff that might give her some relief.
I am loving this dipped black shirt, No idea why,
For him no minstrel raptures swell;
It’s pretty obvious why he would keep this one, as is. No problems here with me. Well, maybe I’ve neglected to visit with Lord Poseidon, and sacrifice to him more often, since I live next to the Gulf of Mexico. Actually, I could do more offerings to Aphrodite, Columbia, Dionysos and Apollon there, as well, considering they all have oceanic associations.
Chetan Bhagat’s Five Point Someone is a disappointment. If the 270-pager has an engaging plot or storyline, the reader doesn’t get an inkling till Page 70, when I gave up on the book. It is not as if Chetan comes up with an unexpected insight into life in a college hostel (for men). The boys in the novel don’t do any thing most of us hadn’t, in our undergrad days. Maybe most of us didn’t have a professor’s daughter for a girl friend.
categorized, it can certainly be said that they were a huge
After this stage of editing is done I'm going to beg some people to read the whole thing and see what questions and misconceptions I need to clear up. I will also see if they spot the (probably many) deliberate mistakes I make to see if they are awake.
From May through October, they open their home as a bed and breakfast – Drop Anchor Inn. There are three charming rooms from which to choose. The care and attention to detail in the rooms and common areas are evident.
At this point it became a race as to who could gracefully exit the room first.
COOK pasta as directed on package, omitting salt.
different in some way
If you have any questions, please just ask, someone will know the answer or will find out real fast. You are now among family and friends.
Time 5'32
off (learned courtesy of GaGa and PaPa's dog who is always climbing up on things he shouldn't!)
Two days later my stepfather worked as a welder. My mother got a nursing job and we moved into a three bedroom house located two hours away in a small town.
Students protested and Santa Monica CC responded with equal opportunity application of pepper spray.
listening rock again
1/2 tsp mustard seeds
For the past year, everyone around me has been going on and on about the series The Big Bang Theory. My students tried to convince me of its merits many times even going as far as making me watch a few episodes with them. I had to admit, it cracked me up. I even watched the episodes that were offered for viewing on my flight this past April. Finally, with nothing better to do with my time, I decided to do a proper viewing of the series starting with the first episode. Thanks to my friend Emily giving me all the episodes, I didn't even have to deal with searching for and streaming the episodes myself.
Anime fan or not, chances are that if you are reading this, you have some working knowledge of The Melancholy of Haruhi Suzumiya, the light novel series that exploded into a multi-media sensation midway through the first decade of the new millenium. The series, as narrated by the sarcastic highschool student, Kyon, tells the tale of Haruhi Suzumiya, a peculiar girl with reality-warping powers that can only be described as ‘godlike.’ The twist? Haruhi has no idea that she is capable of these things, leaving space-time at the mercy of her subconscious and mental state.
But meeting the Risen Lord had changed everything about these first disciples, and knowing the Risen Lord should also change everything about us.
“Do you know Ethan told him off yesterday for picking on you?”
The Upsetters - Land Of Dub
After years of wanting them, months of going back and forth, and 2 weeks of researching and weighing out the pros and cons, I finally decided to make the leap and buy them.
“A journey is a person in itself; no two are alike. And all plans, safeguards, policing, and coercion are fruitless. We find that after years of struggle that we do not take a trip; a trip takes us“. John Steinbeck
there will be more today...it's monday!
1 The Torah tells us to honor the old and wise
5. My juvenile - Björk & Me
Those two reasons for cannibalism do not fall into the category of Anthropophagy as they are based upon survival and tradition; Anthropophagy itself is a psychological disorder where one has powerful compulsions to eat human flesh. Where Geophagy is most attributed to malnutrition and Trichophagia is attributed to stress/depression, Anthropophagy is more often tied in with mental and sexual disorders where the man-eater is not of sound mind or gains sexual satisfaction from doing so. A lot of people may have heard of the following story but just a quick warning that it is a little disturbing.
Or the time I didn’t put sunscreen on and ended up looking like a lobster, except not as edible. You could’ve sent me to Greenland to heat up their homes because I was radiating that much damn heat. Instead we tried things like smearing me with yoghurt (I smelt like milk gone bad within about two minutes) and tomatoes (I smelt a little like a salad but this surprisingly worked – or enough days had passed that my burn finally settled, or I stopped feeling the pain). If I get diagnosed with skin cancer I will remember this experience and know that this no doubt was what caused the major damage.
Parents. Perhaps the most publicized problem with the current system
I didn’t know Pi Day was a thing until last year. I’m pretty sure that’s around the time someone made it up. I mean, I get it. I’m not that bad at math. I feel like people are grasping at holiday straws, though. Why not something like Old People Day on January 22nd? Jeanne Calment lived to be 122 years old, hence the date of my proposed holiday. We could celebrate by planning for our possibly really long retirements. Just some food for thought.
I couldn't tell his age exactly but lines crawled across his forehead and around his downcast eyes. His pristine gray pinstripe suit stood out against the rain forest backdrops and the techno colors around him. A large textbook highlighted in a multitude of colors spread out on the tiny table. Large green plugs filling his ears and index cards filled with scribbles balanced by the edge of the table. Highlighters, used tea bags, glasses and a pocket translator managed to find and fill any remaining spaces.
You see, I have a secret...I haven't been faithful. To, Annie, that is.
Pinsky said that he hadn’t seen such studies, but “some of the leading sports economists, who looked at this,” said that the city and state investment was “considerably lower” than in other cities. (I think he was pointing to Andrew Zimbalist. Then again, TV and other revenues in New York are higher.)
as the only deﬁnition for ‘fucked’
The Powell Home 224 E. Michigan
Now of course.. back home in everyday life buying milk is nowhere near as pretty an adventure, but at least I have the memories.
Basic Black, Melon Mambo and Whisper White Cardstock
- To have a bloody good party meet up with your friends without having to drive next day or break the bank.
- Heidi & Robert M.
The girl with the snarly lip didn’t reply to her but pointed some more and spoke to her friends. “Look at her a gypsy. My mum said stay away from them they’ll steal the gold from your teeth!”
So we start there. Its time to realize that it is only your belief, that it is difficult to change a belief, which makes it difficult to change any belief. It is rather simple but may seem confusing. Simply put, its easy to change a belief as long as you believe that it is easy. Once you believe this it will become very easy to make any changes about any beliefs.
Song of the moment: Can’t Say No by Conor Maynard
Would venture out and take the risk
I’ve now written the chapter, so I feel like I need to go back to the beginning and re-read. The problem is that whenever I spot something that needs work I stop reading and put all of my brain power into an editing task, a few chapters of doing this and I’m not sure what I have and what I’ve changed.
Just for fun though, I will share a some things that I would love to do, but just in my lifetime, not by a certain age. Some are more serious and close to my heart, while others are not nearly as important to me.
Bully
Sam Concepcion as Marc
Laughs lilting from the cooks.
*Authors note. Please do not really do any of these, and then sue me. Thanks!
The rich man is a good example of someone that understands the gravity of sinning against God and going to Hell. God loves us (John 3:16) and wants us to be saved from Hell (2 Peter 3:9).
1 shadow
1 protest
544 ***D-X/25/1963. “The Problem of Loyalty: The City and Its Gods in Plato’s Apology.” Hillel Foundation Jewish Student Center, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1964(2), above, and in Item B-2, above, pp. 8-29 (1975).)
peoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeop
See? You can barely even tell they don't "match" now! I do want to spray them again with a high-gloss finish, but I haven't gotten around to it yet. I did, however, get around to purchasing those Snow Leopard pillows though, and I love them!
Tuck the wings underneath the chicken and place it breast side up, on a roasting pan (preferably with a rack). Cook in preheated oven at 230 degC for around 10-15 mins then turn down to 200degC for around 40-45 minutes or until the skin is nicely browned. To test whether the chicken is done, pierce the tip of a knife near the joint between the drumstick and the thigh. The juices should run clear (not pink), if it is still pink, cook the chicken a little longer. Let the chicken rest for 15 minutes before serving. This allows the juices to settle and redistribute and the chicken will be much more succulent.
It's not really possible to "live as if school doesn't exist", because so many depend on it existing and do not question the order of things. And you know, a lot of days that whole business is tricky enough without the pressure of WHY WHY WHY, EXPLAIN YOURSELF.
Approaching Dusk
Don’t scrub your skin with soap for at least 1/2 hour after you get sun exposure:
Between 14 – 16 people were murdered at this scene. The murder of Hermanus Potgieter was particularly savage and also of a ritualistic nature. The thesis by J J De Waal quotes about 20 different sources and witnesses concerning these murders. Scroll down to view a more detailed description of these murders under the heading, “How did Hermanus Potgieter get himself killed?”
By far, the best part about this website is that membership is free. There is absolutely no fees attached to creating your account and sharing your stuff!
I do believe this is the biggest part that stuck out to since doing this study of Samuel. From what I get from this part of scripture is that God is basically spitting Saul out. He basically says that your burnt offerings means nothing if you don’t have obedience. Saul disobeyed the Lord. He was given orders and he went against them. The Lord rejected Saul as Israel’s king. The Lord was serious! There are obviously consequences when we disobey God. I just look back to when I would disobey and reject my mom’s orders and she would obviously have to discipline me or else I wouldn’t take her seriously. The Lord is the same way. Now that being said there is forgiveness for disobedience. Saul asked and pleaded for forgiveness and obviously the Lord forgave him however he wasn’t reappointed king of Israel because he had to learn his lesson.
I used to go to the cinema two sometimes three times a week as, unlike today, there was a lot to choose from. By the time I was 14, in 1962, I could usually get into 'A's without much trouble. During this transitional period I was attending the 'Saturday Morning Pictures' at the Regal, Rayleigh and was caught up in the Batman serial.
“Like Joe, I’m a huge fan of Half-Life. I bring a crowbar with me to every spring practice. There ain’t a spot in the game I haven’t been to, and that includes the places you could only reach by Gauss jumping. Trust me when I say I’ll do the G-Man proud,” Bowden said.
The owner's name is Rose and she is a pretty lady in her late 40s. She knows more about my personal life than most anyone else. She's watched my laundry pile in various stages of life- happily matching men's socks and then not and back and forth several times in the 5 years I've been on this street. She knows.
Now I don't eat it with noodles to save on Points...but you can. I also didn't make it in
Finally, the meeting tied up. I asked the bishop when he thought that the older kids would be back. After 9pm, he said. So I decided to take Joe and Leo and go home. I'd come back for Jake and Tom.
So at this point I realised that if I was to get off the Gill I would probably break some bones; a lot of bones, as I couldn’t see any way down. I decided to use my ass on a scree and slide down to the drop into the stream that I could see below, or I could call mountain rescue to get me off there! I couldn’t face that so broken bones was the best choice in my mind. I pushed myself off and i plummetted down and down and down…here it comes, first broken bone. Just at the drop I slid to a gentle stop. Pebbles in my shorts and grazed arse, but no broken bones. I learnt not to use those offpiste routes ever again and followed someone else at least and then the two of you can help each other out if it gets difficult.
I'm aware that time is passing by much too quickly, and I feel like I'm not 100% totally here as a mother & wife, if you know what I mean. It's not a good thing. I need to be here for my kids & husband. Not just physically, but mentally & emotionally. I need to be 100% here.
1 Kings 22:8
There are very limited exemptions from the proposed provisions and those can be viewed at the JCC website.
That is my leg, adorned in Minnie Mouse comfy pants. That blond person is my daughter. Ghost Adventures is on TV and I magically timed my camera to take the picture when the words were on the screen.
There were many, many terrible pictures taken. And the boy and girl danced very poorly.
A co-worker presented me with the earrings that were her mother's once she saw me wearing the first brooch and they really compliment each other. My little butterfly pin is so sweet as well and for the life of me I can't recall where I came across it. Odd for me as I usually remember where all of my treasures originated and what we had to pay for them. Some really great finds for really great prices have enabled me to have a great collection.
There is a lot going on in this life of mine right now...
Imran Khan is a Senior Correspondent with Tehelka.
This may provide some insight into what happens to those invisible “moderate” Muslims when they get out of line.
Our love was like the sun that holds the earth and moon in its orbit. Could we dare to dream of a bigger universe than the one we knew? What was out there?
Written by Molly Meeker, Charles R. Meeker & Leslie Scharf
Okay, let’s make this one easy. I want you, right now, to try and bite the nearest human being so it breaks the skin. Go ahead.
Brown ales are not the most exciting style in the world, but this one crackles with rich, roasted malt and nutty flavors like a Civil War-era rifle. Has a little grainy mouth feel to it, but that was a plus to me. We're in Kansas, it should be grainy. A really excellent brown ale.
Hubby: They’re lovely flowers.
My Grandmother's personal heirloom to me was an old musical box. Its tinny tones had been muted by age, but on accidentally removing the cover and exposing its innards, the volume increased in body. However, I became more involved in the works themselves. I used to love restraining the revolving brass cylinder, my fingers contesting with the pent up tremulous energy of the motor. Better yet to impede the tugged teeth of the comb, dulling their plucked peal. The most satisfying was to let the tiny pins embedded in the cylinder, play over the pads of my fingers before they palpated the lamellae. Seeing the indented flesh and then watching it regain itself and the livid red pinpricks fade. The plasticity of my own skin accompanied by the box's anthem.
I had a my darshan of Shankar Bhagvan in a temple right outside the hotel. I walked and share-autoed my way to Bhedaghat. I saw the Narmada water falls from the tramcar-in-the air (Rs 40/-) and went for the boat ride on narmada river between marble rocks (Rs 41/-). The boatman gave us a description of the different kinds of marble, pointed out little caves in the rocks where saints meditated, showed shivalingams installed on little islands mid-river by kings and of course the places where the modern devas ie movie stars shot different movie sequences. He had a rather poetic expression and it was nice to see Narmada as a proper river.
I simply remember my favorite things….
It has always been our contention that Aberdeenshire gold mined at Rhynie in early-historic times which found its way into Pictish hoards (Traprain Law, Edinburgh) and later melted to form delicate tracery in the Crown Jewels of the King of Scots was one of the major reasons for Rhynie’s importance. After all, a Pictish sub-King who had gold mines on his doorstep and whose pre-Christian ancestors had built no fewer than 10 (Neolithic) stone circles within a radius of as many miles, descended from a great lineage which was responsible for maintaining important sacred traditions. Rhynie’s local mountain, Tap o’ Noth, with its supremely defensive Caledonian triple-ringed hillfort, can be seen for 30 miles in all directions. It is an Aberdeenshire landmark.
As he leant across the table to unplug it, the screen lit up, and he realised it had been sleeping rather than switched off. There was a document still open on the screen; she must have been working on that before she went out to cut the grass. It didn’t look like work though, maybe a story, or a diary entry. Tom started to read.
There is always the understanding that if you love fake meat, you must be a badvegetarian. REAL vegetarians only eat whole food and don’t even use tofu as a crutch, never mind delectable processed soy products (horrors!), usually found in the frozen food section next to the pizzas. I was in this camp for about a day, and while I do try to limit fake meat to once a week, I believe it is a miracle and an important key to staying a vegetarian for the long haul.
And it's exhilarating.
Hi guys
Then I realise I need to have another shower!!
allow me to give them to you.
there is a live video recorded just a couple of months later (June 3, 1988) at the Dominion Theater in London UK with seven songs from the debut album, and another one called "the year of the horse" recorded in Brussels and Rotterdam in late Oct. 1990, and a couple of others recorded in the 2000's.
I'm taking the opportunity to do a blog post about my latest fashion quandary, but first I want to pimp out my other BFF, Kendra, who has a new blog up called Daily Flair. Go follow her! She's a costume geek and super fabulous, and always has interesting things to discuss.
Looking out earlier I thought there was a dust storm blowing between the trees.
Well then. After my last posing it took a bit of time to smooth all my feathers back down.
So here we are just hitting May and already this year we have had some great things from Big Finish including the Sixth Doctor with Flip; the excellent Emerald Tiger; Blake’s 7 and last but by no means least the Fourth Doctor adventures.
Watch the video again I say Life CHANGING!
So Happy Children's Day to you!
In the first place, how many times did Mom drill into my head that if you didn’t have something nice to say about someone, it was better not to say anything at all? It is difficult for me to write anything less than a 4-star review. Three stars is about as low as I go.
‘Squintar’ by Annemarie Neary
On what is publicly available now, there seems little chance of Mr Wight facing proceedings for perjury in connection with this case. If he is implicated in other matters now being investigated, such as involvement in phone hacking etc, then that is a question for another day.
Cutting Instructions:
Two children begging in rags
Living so wicked year after year.
“Wait, no,” I thought, “I should take a picture first.” So I took a picture and then opened it. The box was heavy and beat-up from the journey across the States and the Pacific. It was from Nikki who is one of the most fabulous beings in the universe and she just so happens to live on Earth in 3-D, AND she just so happens to be my friend. You can see that I blurred out the last names and addresses of sender and receiver for obvious reasons…so just an FYI: The box didn’t come like that.
You’re the dam at Boulder,
I know I've been absent here for almost a week, but it's really been a crazy one. I'll be sharing some details about the events that went down, soon. For now, though, I'm still undecided about whether I should go for a pink top or a black top for my spotted silk wedding guest dress.
NOTE: And the LORD thy God will put all these curses upon thine enemies, and on them that hate thee, which persecuted thee. Deuteronomy 30:7
A time to yearn for warmer days of 2010.
Film Release Date: January 21, 2011
So where does that leave us? That leaves us the with politically unpopular (though not as unpopular as politicans would lead us to believe) decision to raise taxes. And I guess "raise" taxes is not really the proper term. We should simply let the unpaid-for tax cuts that the Bush administration put into place expire.
National Coalition of American Nuns Denounces Disrespectful Words of Rush Limbaugh, Groups and Policies that Further Gender Discrimination
As always, there are a few rules:
